There is nothing I like better than to put a smile on someone's face because of my crafting :0)
- I remember that like it were five minutes ago. You'd legs like Bo Derek and a do like Bonnie Tyler. I wanted to climb up those fishnets and crawl inside yer womb.
The security guard without a word, turned around and left.
~ Domestic vendors and imported vendors were placed in two completely separate locations, but you could travel from one to the other on chauffeured golf carts provided as courtesy. This was a nice touch, and proved that you do not actually have to be playing golf to enjoy riding on a golf cart while hammered.
“Alaska is a novel about the most important event in these people’s lives, so it made sense to me to structure the story in the same way. Also, I thought it would be neat.”
OK- now it's time for the part you all have been waiting for- the giveaway! My Memories is giving me a free download of this software to share with ONE lucky reader!!!
When I think about how the next couple of week's worth of outfit photos will most likely be the last of winter, I sort of can't believe it. When we moved to Pittsburgh, we had no idea what to expect in terms of winter weather. I know this year was far milder than most (according to my coworkers), but compared to even the mildest New England winter, this has been a cake walk. I know part of it has to do with being back in an office: I can trudge in in the morning wearing my sensible Sorel's, and change into not-so-sensible footwear at my desk. But then we had days like this too, where the winter sun shone a little warmer, and there were glimpses of spring beneath it all.
I piccoli strass sulle stelline danno tanta luce.
Irishman 1: Well, there's the 1:30 Belfast train.
It shattered into millions of little pieces!
Seems we've finally made a turn for the better over hear. Mo more aching ears, soar throats or wheezy coughs. So in celebration we are heading to the store after P.E. to get the ingredients to make these and this. Yum! I love the guiltless pleasure of pregnant indulgence :) Don't worry, I do plan to at least share the cheese cake with our friends on Friday night.
But I still feel old...and I don't think that feeling will ever really go away....
Topol is enthusiastic about the idea of a partnership between doctors and patients, in which the doctor takes more of an advisory and interpretive role. A few insurance companies have already indicated interest in this model as well.
Thanks Cara!
Kennedy who famously said, “Life is not fair”, would be assassinated in 1963 and next in line was Lyndon Baines Johnson who took the nation into war with Vietnam and 58,000 dead young Americans later he decided not to run for reelection. I still recall the protest marches. The sixties became synonymous with “hippies”, a burgeoning drug culture, and some of the best rock’n roll ever performed.
Charlie and I kept our friend's, Josh and Lindsey's, little boy, Gardner a few Fridays ago so they could go out on a hot date. We had so much fun with him. Gardner is such a sweet little boy. He is especially sweet with Nola Grace. Here are a few of our adventures with G baby!
Performance management:
Today, I purpose in my heart to find the bliss in the boring. This life is too precious for me not to enjoy each and every moment.
Kathy has chosen this weeks theme. After seeing one of Stewart's photos the other day, she's gone for the artistic idea of 'impressionism"; the late 19th century French art movement.
So glad you stopped by today - grab a cup of my new favorite coffee, Hazelnut....it's so good, and I'll show you what's been goin on around here -
Yes, yes. I know. Where have I been, you say? The answer, for the most part, is that I've been writing songs. There's more to the story than that, of course, but most of the other stuff isn't all that interesting, so we can leave it at that.
There was an incident at day care and I had to pull Junior out of there. My lovely sister-in-law keeps him after school for me now. She is so good to me and my family, I feel like an ass for not including her more often. My brother has been away at school for over a year and I've never even had her and the kids over for dinner ONCE in that time. Why is it so hard to juggle taking care of your home and family and remember to include the rest of your family. Who all live within 20 miles of your home? I'm looking forward to brother graduating at the end of this month, he'll be able to babysit while we go do something fun. Or check in to a hotel and take a damn nap in peace.
When they use the term March Madness...no one was joking. March has been a roller coaster of emotions for me. I have a few event posts for you guys and stuff I really need to give away.
My doctor said I'm one step away from endometrial cancer, so I'm very glad we're getting this taken care of now. But on the other end of the spectrum, there is a lot involved. Not being able to get out of bed by myself for a few days. No work. No exercising. No driving. No going up and down stairs. No wearing jeans (though really, that is not a big sacrifice!). No crunches! (Oh, the withdrawal I shall suffer...just kidding.)
-Point out Equality Act.
your smooth voice inside the refrigerator.
But a poodle.... Even the breed name is a bit wussy, you have to admit. Poo-dill. When a cattledog marks his territory, it's on three legs, mate, the fourth thrust aggressively in the air, a precious measured-to-the-millimetre squirt on a treetrunk, or a car wheel, or similarly appropriate place.
Anyway, the point is, that I have finally and irrefutably discovered the joy of 'support'. I have always felt that I should be able to manage. But I can't and as my philosophical painter said, neither can he. We all need people to help us to do the stuff we aren't so good at, and sometimes, that needs paying for.
“How you doin’, Stevie?” He says it like they know each other, but not well.
I’ll have a schedule. I can now be late for work. I will most likely be late for work. I have to speak to human beings, actual people, face to face. I should probably wear makeup. I should probably learn how to wear makeup.
Please keep confidential!!
And I have been thankful
Now all I could think about was that I had to put my hand in this black hole and I knew I would touch a frog. Not only am I having the day from hell but I am now a contestant on I'm a Celebrity Get Me Out of Here. I bent down and was convinced I saw an eye - oh it was awful - I cannot describe the fear of putting my hand in that black pipe. I tried time and time again and even with Asda's help I could not start feeling around. I started to do my best impersonation of a baby duckling and its an intermittent scratchy whistle. Nothing.
Sometimes I wonder how is it that a 7 year old a 4 year old and a 1 year old can make such a mess??
“When I got older I decided I wanted to be a real writer. I tried to write about real things. I wanted to describe the world, because to live in an undescribed world was too lonely.”
The film did win three Academy Awards in the areas of Editing, Score, and Sound.
Oh, by the way, her parents will be richer, as well, as Kendall’s wealth grows—they manage all the girls. Do you think this has anything at all to do with Kendall’s going very public with all these personal aspects of her young life?
So I made a second batch. This time I almost doubled the baking time, still not knowing how to tell if it was done or not. But when I pulled it out of the oven, it was already collapsed! What was I doing wrong?
Gil Scott-Heron – I’m New Here
Ever since I left Australia in 1962, I've been in love with this country... to the point of working as a sailor on a Greek tramp steamer, and learning to communicate in Modern Greek.
F. left yesterday on a business trip. He is usually in charge of taking the children to kindergarden and daycare since I go to the office shortly after 7AM. Since I had some paid leave hours I had to use up by the end of the month before they expired, I decided I would drop the children at school and take a day off all for myself. This was a first in the five years I have been a mom.
All parents have dreams, but how many of us have slowly and gradually surrendered those dreams somewhere after we’ve hit the familiar potholes of delay, failure and frustration, which may seem to be increasing in their size and frequency as we live out our regular parenting routines... ?
I’m currently reading SparkPeople, and I am continuing my journey to become more healthy and lose weight.
Let’s hear them, and anything else you would care to discuss on this open thread.
This time was no different.
Here are the Copics I used for this card:
CD: How do you write? What is your typical writing day?
GIVE me my scallop-shell of quiet,
pale cookie moon
A couple of weeks ago my Mom sent me an email advertisement from Amazon.ca. I'll confess, I am not always ready to jump on the junkmail bandwagon, so I was a little slow to read it. Slow meaning, I didn't open it that second, but saw the subject on my Crackberry (aka Blackberry) when it arrived. No worries though, my Mom called me five minutes later to let me know she had sent it! Do you get the idea it must be important and not just junkmail?
I colored the little things with my copic markers and matted them on some bright blue cardstock. I printed the black and white polka dot paper on my Imagine with the Black and White cartridge. I embossed some red paper with my Cuttlebug and added that as a strip across the middle. The setiment which says Hope Your Birthday is Something Special was printed on my computer.
Each fall is better than the last. We're a little wiser, a little more cultured and a little more ready to invest in some yummy staples for our wardrobes. As we enter into this season with bliss, let's examine a few new trends that are catching our eye.
Maggie has a secret. And she’s not the only one… the handsome groom Michael, the beautiful new French nanny Therese, the Darlingtons’ teenage houseguests Teddy and Jessica, and even Maggie’s younger sister Lila are all hiding something. Passion, betrayal, heartache, and whispered declarations of love take place under the Darlingtons’ massive roof. And one of these secrets has the power to ruin the Darlingtons forever.
Equity Balance @ 12/31/2010: $3,290.72
Secret moments, shared in the heat of the afternoon
Not much news to report. I’ve been reading a lot this week. Have read one book from start to finish and gotten half way through another one. Have a whole bunch of other books lined up to read later. I will finally be starting to read the Harry Potter books. This I do because I want to know what it’s all about now that the whole phenomenon is on its last round of hype due to the last movie opening this week.
For the cookies: Preheat oven to 350. Combine the cake mix, sour cream, eggs and dash of vanilla in a large bowl of an electric mixer. Mix on medium speed for just under 2 minutes. Drop the batter by the tablespoon full onto a lined cookie sheet. Bake for 10 minutes, let cool briefly on the sheet before moving to a cooling rack.
Another amount of time later. Swerve. "Ew. there's so many dead things on the road tonight."
Such blandness and calculation have always laid at the Eagles' heart. They were conceived in the early '70s with the steely purpose of malling late '60s country-rock, of planing down all the edge and dust off guys like Gram Parsons until his style ended up sounding more like Bread. But the care of the Eagles' vocals, and the singability of their tunes, forgave a decent amount of their smugness, slickness and greed ( I am not so sure I agree with this paragraph).
The last series of Big Brother, I’m proud to say, I never saw a single second of. I’m really not interested in the show anymore but I do glance through entertainment news and a certain article caught my eye. Here are some quotes:
Remove from the pan to a cutting board, tent with foil and let rest for 5 minutes before slicing.
I almost got up and jumped on him. Instead, I lay there, feigning sleep until 11, when Gram started making food. I could smell and hear her working. I heard Mr. T move, and I opened my eyes and peeked over the arm of the couch. He was half-sitting and when I peeked over, we were eye to eye. We both grinned, looking impossibly child-like and silly. But the pleasure of waking up with him sent a rush of endorphins through me.
Below is a video of Grace singing "Firework" by Katie Perry... an anthem that is more than fitting for the both of them.
We call out and grieve.
Stop the Islamization of America, which Geller and Spencer founded, has been listed as a hate group by the Southern Poverty Law Center, a non-profit civil rights watchdog.
Let’s get back to the exterior….. Originally, the entire house was painted gray. I wanted to brighten it up and make it look more like a cottage in the Hamptons. I fell in love with the idea of painting the house white and the trim black… what a beautiful, dramatic contrast it turned out to be! The exterior lanterns came from The Federalist and can hold up to the outdoor elements, which need to be considered in a beach environment. The gutters and downspouts are copper and I can’t wait until they patina with age!
Structural Engineer: Lukas Quach, Axial Engineering, Van Nuys, CA
Some would have you believe the haggis is a three-legged creature with two long legs and one short leg, that runs around the Scottish highlands.
He doesn't know what is an employer.
Only when i need to know what day a certain date is, i never buy calenders though it seems like EVERYTHING has one
SNN is asking parents and community leaders from across the state to join them at the Empowerment Congress Summit and to wear purple to symbolize their support. Through “Equality for Our Kids—Stand Up, Speak Out, Take Action,” SNN hopes to engage thousands of parents to participate in the initiative, and expand its Parent Advocacy Mentor program to offer training to an additional 200 future grassroots leaders.
The problem then is: given my diverse reactions, are Smisje beers to be recommended? Ah sure go on then. I'm intrigued to find out what they do next.
“My heart rejoices in the LORD;
This celestial harbinger of enlightenment, disruption and the vigorous breaking up of the order of things hit her mark on the stage right on cue – within 24 hours of her transition from the watery underworld to the bright light of day. Japan’s earthquake and subsequent tsunami and possible meltdown of a nuclear reactor originated in the unconscious depths of the oceans, travelled up through the conductive medium of water, and made herself known in open air. This is the perfect metaphor for Uranus Rising and exactly the kind of roiling surface between our collective conscious and unconscious self of which I spoke in my previous two entries (Fasten Your Seat Belts and Secure Your Diving Belt). This impact will ripple across the surface of our minds for a long time to come, even as the earthquake itself has set off a vibration within the core of our planet equivalent to that of a ringing bell, which will resound into our future. We should imagine a brass tibetan singing bowl, having just been cleanly struck by our cosmic meditator. This event represents the arrival of Uranus in our consciousness and provides a full spectrum of the kinesthetic enlighenment that Uranus bestows in her wake. As astrological aspects already indicated, this Spring is destined to be unusually active with transitions and more unpredictable bellweathers forecast.
5. Using wooden spoon, gently fold eggwhite mixture into
I had my doubts when I received Code Name Verity for review. I thought a World War two, YA book about spies would be boring, unbelievable and a waste of time. But I had heard so much about it that I just had to give it a go.
Number of random items I removed from my desk = 21
The website has been closed for the Christmas break, and I have been busy behind the scenes getting the sale ready, lots and lots of bargains to be found - I really do think this is our biggest sale ever. We need lots of room (and some cash lol) as we are going to be doing a spot of diversification (is that a word ?!) at CHA at the end of the month, don't worry, we will still be stocking all your fave papercrafting products, just adding a totally new department to the store. I will have to keep you all guessing for the time being, just until we can get it all organised - I am really excited about it and can't wait to spill the beans !!
This week I went to a training seminar regarding a new content management system. It was typically pitched at idiot-guide level and inevitably became bogged down with debate about ‘social media’. The conversation featured everything from the grim realisation that you can’t switch your twitter profile off at 5pm, to the inevitable public sector question of accountability and what’s known internally as arse-covering. One person became so distressed by the potential pitfalls that they proclaimed, and I quote, “Social media is DANGEROUS!”
Like the rubber tire.
- Try and read one new book each month for relaxation and inspiration (fun, adventure, fiction)
High Today: I might be.
Subscribe to: Posts (Atom)
The very next day, she of course had to go to work. We've been keeping the curtains closed on the patio door for a reason, one which she can't seem to comprehend. This is not an invitation for her, or ANYONE, to come up on my patio and bang on the glass fucking door. And yet, she does it anyway. This time, she had gone in the house to change and take out her trash first, so she was already wearing her nightgown, and had taken out her bottom teeth. I almost didn't answer it. She knows we don't like it when she does this. If I have the curtains closed, it's typically because I'm not dressed appropriately. Just because she is comfortable coming in my house, in front of my husband, in her nightgown, doesn't mean I want other people to see me in mine. She has to walk past my inside front door to get to her own anyway. It boggles my mind.
Not wishing to be bored
Have you ever opened your credit card bill and been absolutely shocked at how much it is? Worse still, have you ever been too scared to open it, knowing you were going to be shocked? How about going into your wallet and going “where did that $100/$200/$300 etc go? We call this being in the “money fog”! Essentially not having any clue how much money we are spending or have spent.
None of the publishing firms bid on the contract. The no‐cost nature of contract would have an “anticompetitive effect,” said an industry group, the Coalition for Patent and Trademark Information Dissemination. The arrangement, said a spokesman in a letter to USPTO, would give Google “inequitable advantages in timing, branding and inside technical information” that “are clearly in violation of existing statutes, and would result in unfair competitive advantage over other resellers of patent and trademark information.”
- Blood oranges $1.99/lb ($4.39/kg, USA, Sunkist)
Please accept my apology
"If it were my pension contributions being invested in an industry whose only product line killed people in the numbers that die from tobacco, I would be absolutely horrified. As a doctor I think it would be completely unethical to have any part in it", Scally added.As a doctor, Scally, I think it's rather fucking unethical of you to think that you should have any say in financial matters whatsoever.
"Aren’t you going crazy, though? At least a little bit? Referring to yourself in the third person? Writing about yourself as though you were a character?" I asked.
Dan goes on, really getting wound up now:
Reflecting on past experiences, whether recent or many years ago, can be an instant growth spurt. We gain insight and wisdom into living.
That sounds so simple, people tend to think it won’t work. Yet what issues won’t that solve? If you want to live gay, go for it, it’s none of the governments business. If you want to do drugs, go for it. As long as you don’t endanger anyone else. By the way, we already have that function for alcohol. If you want to own a big gun, go for it. If you hurt someone with it, you are going away for a long time.
Italy throws a punch at Austria and misses, but Austria falls over anyway. Italy raises both fists in the air and runs round the room chanting.
Sure to a day
We took a few pictures, and then I noticed them – an Igloo cooler, a grill, a hot tub. Holy bats. This was someone’s house! And there we were, snapping away in the front yard. We quickly packed up and sped out. Thankfully the owners weren’t home!
Since T10 announced they were removing the cap all I’ve done is compete in Rivals events for unicorns. I’ve been worried about how much the title update would screw things up. This game is nearly 6 months old at this point and my playing peaked during the Christmas/New Years Holidays. March Madness has seriously impacted my playing time and this summer looks like I’ll be busy working out of town, so my driver level probably won’t go up much more. I have been running another gamertag “Skink McCoy” through career. I finished World Tour and will probably do most of my driving under that gamertag from here on out.
It even goes with the funky curtains I made to cover up the two odd closet-y things (without doors) built into the eaves beyond the chimney, on either side (it's an odd room and impossible to describe).
But do we? Really?
one chapter in form 5 text was on Silhouette,
I will do a post devoted entirely to the short row...don't worry about scary words, like wrapping etc that will all come later :)
She’s diligent at watering them every day and checking few times a day to make sure they are doing OK, and which ones are starting to sprout. She takes them outside when it’s sunny, bringing them back in in the evening, watering them some more, letting them go without water if they looked wet. Moving them to the art studio where it’s warmer (sadly, but it is the only insulated place in our home) was a great idea. She’s really taking very good care of her seeds and her little starts as they start appearing.
We arrived in Semur in the rain at 14:30, found a room at the Hotel Les Cymaises right in the center of town, and persuaded the friendly owner of a nearby bistro to make us a croque monsieur and a tarte Provincal. With a few glasses of his house Burgundy, the spirits were revived.
Guy fighting equipment with exact clones of themselves, a trap out of their extraction barrier marks. Deidara takes Gaara's body outside the cave, followed by Naruto and Kakashi. Chiyo and Sakura are left to fight Sasori.
The younger Kim, who recently assumed the top posts of the ruling party, the state and the military, has proclaimed that he will further develop North Korea’s military might.
I may be only twenty-one but I've had a few girlfriends and me fair share of heartache and trash!
Here’s a good reminder:
Sun, 11:11pm: Mom, can you pick up the phone?!
dish and this is a winner. Serve with your favorite white wine and you will be in bliss.
Was the stimulus bill online for five days of sunlight? It was not an emergency bill because you found time to go home, chill out for Valentine’s Day and then sign it four days later to much fanfare in a swing state.
I am SOOOO looking forward to cooking foods for Cadet. And I have already thumbed through several different cookbooks and gotten a few ideas. Since our area is a cornucopia of fresh fruits and veggies, I can’t wait to let loose with him at the Farmer’s Market. I am really looking forward to when we can take him out to our favorite Indian or Thai restaurant and letting him experience those spices and flavors for the first time. I feel that part of exposing Cadet to the wonders of this world will happen when he first tastes a light curry or miso soup or even just a fresh peach still warm from the sun.
Do you have games you love? I’m always looking to add to our extensive collection!
Eric Hoffer (1902-1983) is nobody’s ideal of a public intellectual. He had no real schooling. He spent most of his working life as a longshoreman on the San Francisco docks. Almost every day, he took a three-mile walk. Along the way, thoughts formed. Later they became sentences, then books. Over the years, he wrote ten. “The True Believer” is his masterpiece. The genius of this book is Hoffer’s ability to see beyond individual behavior to patterns of thought and behavior.
Dombey and Son
NOW ONLY $ 29
Well, wish me luck.
Turning to Taslin, Rel said, "Never mind. This is the first part of my Clearviewing. We'd better get a move on."
Congratulations to the winners!
SSuite Office – WordGraph 8.4.1 – WordGraph is a free and very useful alternative to Microsoft Word, OpenOffice’s Writer, or anything else out there claiming to be the latest and greatest. You don’t even have a need for .NET or even JAVA to be installed.
I gotta say this is a hard one to review. There is so much to discuss but it would give the movie away. So I shall try my best. First off, the film is a typical slasher flick with five friends in a remote area that encounter non-human creatures that try to kill them, or so you would think…
....Me! After a long (ish) absence, I am ready to re-enter the blogosphere.
Everybody had to pay and pay
*) Designate the port of Rotterdam as compliant with Sharia law.
The Kennedys and Lyndon Johnson were having a sub rosa fight: Jack and Robert Kennedy brought knives to the battle and Lyndon Johnson brought guns and it was settled on 11/22/63 at 12:30 PM in Dallas.
Hello Readers!
Had so many volunteers come for Food Box Day Prep that we got all kinds of things done at the Pantry!
The Lego Club utilizes Lego-based Social Development Theory. The children come together and have to collaborate on Lego set building. Lego building becomes both the incentive and the medium through which they hone their social skills. They are gently guided to be helpful to one another, communicate with each other, share with each other and take turns with each other. But, even more importantly, they are spending time with children their own age, sharing in play, and feeling a sense of belonging to a club. What more could we possibly want....
Do remember to pick up the audio guide!
I decided to make tuna melts using sandwich thins and sliced monterey jack cheese. I put it the toaster oven for approximately 8 minutes and was good to go. This is definitely not necessary but does increase the likelihood of point #3 below.
Being the geek that I am, I beeline for the Discovery Channel.
The four of us left the Jenny Lake Visitor's Center and went back to Colter Campground to relax for the rest of the day. I have to admit Lynda and I are worn out by all the unplanned exercise!
Not anymore. I know I'm going to get some backlash, but we just can't do it anymore.
Format — all it takes is a read over the formatting tips offered on the Screnzy site here. Once this is read you can refer to it all you want. If it’s not perfect formatting FIX IT LATER. We don’t have time to be perfectionists! We have 30 days, people! If you want to do this thing, do this thing!
Today, I was talking to my lunchmates about how i would really love to play the guitar from all the acoustic songs on youtube that motivates me. I have been deciding to learn the guitar for a while. What is holding me back is whether i am able to cope as i am never familiar with string instruments. Fortunately, i have found a couple of friends who think likewise! And yes, i have decided to get a nice guitar probably next month after payday is here as i will really have to save up hard after my Australia trip!
Mugabe met Malema -- who was concluding a four-day visit to the country as a guest of Zanu PF -- at State House for over two hours on Monday.
Skin Care Tip 5:
The examples of scandal, and the progress of superstition, suggested the propriety of more forcible restraints. After a sufficient trial, the fidelity of the novice was secured by a solemn and perpetual vow; and his irrevocable engagement was ratified by the laws of the church and state. A guilty fugitive was pursued, arrested, and restored to his perpetual prison; and the interposition of the magistrate oppressed the freedom and merit which had alleviated, in some degree, the abject slavery of the monastic discipline. The actions of a monk, his words, and even his thoughts, were determined. by an inflexible rule or a capricious superior: the slightest offences were corrected by disgrace or confinement, extraordinary fasts, or bloody flagellation; and disobedience, murmur, or delay were ranked in the catalogue of the most heinous sins. (37)
Sometimes I give away some the tickets I get at St Francis to strangers at the end of the tickets line just to see that bookish smile pop up on their faces.
Zach- "Are you done yet? Can you come get him now? He's getting into everything in my room, he won't leave me alone."
So well done, you two … let’s hope these are the first of many successes in 2012.
Enough with the kvetching. As part of my marathon cooking therapy session (I'm making that up, but maybe there should be such a thing) last weekend, I made gelato. Our old ice-cream maker died an ignominious death a while ago, and we weren't motivated to replace it until a particularly unfortunate incident last month when the gorgeous vanilla ice cream base fully refused to freeze despite hours in the ice-cream maker.
Apparently the Brits have been at it again. Seriously, the colonial hangover lingers? Thankfully there’s tremendous pushback:
Frog Juice
The name "daisy" is usually considered a corruption of "day's eye", because the whole head closes at night and opens in the morning.
and while you’re there, I invite you to check out some of the other historical novels collected by the cooperative!
Grand Ma may not be as intelligent or well read as Anne, and she may not come from a scholarly or noble background, but she’ll always be a thousand times what Anne is.
I've been favorably impressed with what I have read and seen of Goode in the past, but that's in the context of how corrupt the whole system is. Whether I would vote for the Constitutional Party, or vote at all, remains to be seen. The other candidates are abysmally bad, so just about anyone who is not the run-of-the-mill globalist, PC politician looks good by contrast.
We play until each person put all of their popsicle sticks into the container, and then begin again!
Some White Sox fan page on Tumblr stole my label scan and MP3 after the first time i posted it last summer, and who knows where it was linked from there. We'll see where it ends up after this post.
Now, I would assume I was walking away with my backpack and four leashes with four doxies on the end of those leashes. If that was not possible....I'd then walk away with four doxies stuffed inside the backpack, their leashes and a water bowl and my phone in my pocket. I'd pack the family photos that I love in a pocket of the backpack. ( I sure hope I had a big backpack, like the ones from LL BEAN) I'd never leave my pups under any circumstances....I could make do without any of the other stuff, but those dogs depend on me and I would not let them down by walking away.
Sound Off: What are your thoughts on some of the issues mentioned above? Are there other problems that you feel need to be recognized or discussed?
Paper: Bazzill Cardstock, Doodlebug White Glitter Paper
At least I was balanced.
Paul was now becoming even more of an enigma to Lysius, the chief captain. He spoke Greek, and then Hebrew thus identifying himself with the Jewish people. Now, he is Roman as well. Where will the puzzle end? All he is doing is to find out the cause for the great disturbance among the Jews in Jerusalem. I wonder if he would understand, even if he were told.
Makes the PC in Mass Effect sound pretty important. How true is it? Not true enough for many people as of the ending of Mass Effect 3, but how many endings can you fit onto a shiny disc anyway? Still, the endings are apparently not varied enough, or well enough grounded in the previous events, for a lot of players.
Google spokesperson has told following:
Christian laughed, grabbing her legs and picking her up as he stood up. He quickly whisked her from the room and up the stairs. He laid her down on the bed, stripping off his clothes and quickly laying down on top of Addison.
Adam, btw, I wish I had a subscription to cancel, but I guess I'm glad I never gave you my money.
Hmmm…
Srila Prabhupada, you clearly taught that the guru must be a person in the category of Narada Muni.
-Smiled at 4 days old WITH DIMPLES:-)
ETA on 4/29/12: Since this post, 2 of my 6 children have actually developed MRSA boils. The first one was very large and freaked me out, so we treated it with Bactrim and after 10 days it still wasn't completely gone. I decided it was time for natural remedies. After 24 hours on colloidal silver it was GONE. Since then, I've treated 4 boils naturally and within 48 -72 hours they are gone. Only the high ppm colloidal silver works to get rid of them. We use 400ppm from this company. Make sure to order the extra strength. My foster kids with poor immune systems are the only ones who seem to suffer from the MRSA boils. As soon as they develop one, I gently squeeze out as much pus as I can and then spray on a mixture of colloidal silver and tea tree oil. Then they get 1/ml orally of 400ppm colloidal silver 3/times a day until it's gone. I've since discovered that if I give them 1/ml every day, once a day, it keeps the boils away. One other remedy I do in conjunction that I believe is extremely important and essential is homeopathic silicea. I give them 2 tablets every day until it's gone. Homeopathic silicea has proven to be an absolute must-have remedy for my foster children. It is great for vaccine injuries, failure to thrive, and really just poor health in general. For more info on it, see this link. It does an excellent job at stimulating appetites! Plus, it is a remedy that you only have to dose once a month or so. The bottle of 500 tablets for $6 is a great investment! Don't forget the tea tree oil also. This is what I buy from vitacost. If you put it directly on the skin, make sure to mix it with another kind of oil so it doesn't burn. I use coconut oil. Don't be terrified of this bacteria, just educate yourself so that you know how to treat it effectively, quickly and hopefully painlessly.
9: SHIRLEY & LEE - Hey Little Boy
As her mark is inscribed deeply upon my heart, I know that she is always near at hand. I know that she always will be.
So the 12 are in Jerusalem leading the way by example. They are imitating Jesus with courage and an unstopable obsession. Round them the first church forms. Luke gives us two snap shots of the pandemonium: one in Acts 2 and one in Acts 4.
again--so so small...but Im too lazy to image location it so. sorry. LOVE YOU
Today is my dear Mother's Birthday......she would have been 68 years old.
in Cuba for
In August 1997, my dad passed away, just after I learned I was pregnant and my fiance and I had just broken up. Coni once again was a rock for me, my reason to live, my solace... Many more tears were shed into her solid body, she allowed me to cry out my heartbreak and always gave me comfort. When my son was born, I would take him to the barn with me to do chores, Coni absolutely loved her baby! Her eyes would get all soft and she would blow softly into his face just drinking in his baby smell! You could see how much she loved babies, any babies... human, dog, cat, chicken, she would pull me over to baby strollers to see babies, and I always held the baby chicks and kittens up to her face so she could blow at them. It wasn't an alarmed blow, it was a tender sigh I could always see how much she enjoyed babies and allowed her that pleasure.
When the horrors of Stalin's Soviet system started to become common knowledge during the 50s and 60s, they were devastated. For years they lived in a kind of denial state, refusing to change their political beliefs in the face of reality.
A recent White Paper released by the National Population and Talent Division under the Prime Minister’s Office claims that Singapore needs to take in 20,000 to 25,000 new citizens year to sustain its population growth.
“Can we get pie?”
Why couldst thou not remain at school?"
I've included some excerpts. The interview is well worth reading in its entirety.
She also dedicated herself to furthering Winston’s career as writer and politician. In his memoir My Early Life, Winston wrote, “My mother was always on hand to help and advise … She soon became my ardent ally, furthering my plans and guarding my interests with all her influence and boundless energy…We worked together on even terms, more like brother and sister than mother and son. At least so it seemed to me. And so it continued to the end.”
Twain
a better plan for me..
COOPER-CLARKE, JOHN – Disguise In Love (1978)
Homework for advanced students who want to race on ahead: I went onto draw my own font for the header (inspired by Lu's Alphabet print) using the icon shaped like a pencil and the icon shaped like a pen nib as well as a mix of circles and rectangles for the Q and the dot on the i.
The tragedy of the SADC summit is that it is clear that after all these years - and numerous declarations of commitment to democratic principles and all the recognised human and political rights - when it comes to applying those lofty principles to a real-time political crisis in their midst, they mean nothing.
As I say, it all began with Deborah. She’s absolutely committed to children’s fiction and basically threw down the gauntlet. I’d had a couple of adult horror books published by this time (Through a Glass, Darkly (2008) and The Absence (2009)) – now Debs set the challenge to write a genuinely exciting, spooky, inventive and mysterious horror book for kids. For one of my earlier books I’d done some research into the history of the 17th Century witchfinders. Men like the infamous Matthew Hopkins, who went from town to town trying and torturing people on suspicion of witchcraft. This gave me a germ of an idea which quickly developed into a modern horror story with links to the witchfinders of the past. As soon as the notion (and the twist at the end) hit me, I was up and running.
3 higher
He shot a helpless glance to Taylor for backup, but his best friend was in self-preservation mode, suddenly staring sheepishly at his desk to avoid her wrath.
Cost of RV sites (bring your own):
The pulse of our expat tradition beats on and on and on...
Foreign direct investment from lot and condominium sales to non- residents is estimated at $140 million. (TY)
This Is Just To Say
I'll be back laters to add my card to any challenges it may fit but for now here's the finished thing!
So what are some things you can learn about the black widow if you know nothing about them?
Please email me your information!
Patti waited before asking, “Can I read any of it yet?”
Still in the bowl, gently knead the dough by hand, or turn it with a rubber spatula 8 to 10 times. Turn the dough out onto a lightly floured work surface and divide it in half. Working with one piece at a time, pat the dough into a rough circle that's about 5 inches in diameter, cut it into 6 wedges and place on the baking sheet. (At this point, the scones can be frozen on the baking sheet, then wrapped airtight. Don't defrost before baking -- just add about 2 minutes to the baking time.)
SEASONAL
It is very similar to one I have done in the past. I have created cloud masks then added Broken china to the card. I have then used Create a tree and Find joy everyday (M Emberson). The frame is Spellbinder nestabilities Fleur de lis and I have added a wee bit of bling to the flowers.
All you need to do is leave a comment on this posting- and at the end of our 31/31 March book party, I will choose one lucky winner at random. Please make sure that I will be able to identify who you are so I can make contact and send you this precious gift!
In May 2000, I decided that I would do all I could to transition. I would seek a referral to a gender clinic, and see psychiatrists. And then I went to the Northern Concord and sat with the small group of transsexual people there, and hated them. Most did not have jobs. They seemed frightened and withdrawn. So, three days after deciding to transition, I decided I could not.
The BBQ chicken though? I'm all over that.
Happy Christmas to you all!
And bios are weird things. They ask a lot of anyone. Do any of us really know who we are? And if we do - how do we boil it down, condense it, compact it into a few sentences packed with meaning?
Yes...it was!
Not all the types of treatment mentioned above is adequate to treat you flat warts. You should discuss your situation with your physician.
weekday words,
With such an elusive nose, this beer certainly provokes apprehension when taking the first sip. Luckily the beer itself is enjoyable. Elements of brown sugar, plums and pepper create the backbone for the Belgian component of this 7th Anniversary beer. Cinnamon and cocoa round out a slightly roasted characteristic, fulfilling the promise of a Red ale. Last but not least, pine and a dry, bitter finish end the beer on an IPA note. This one is certainly enjoyable, but the epic name raised my expectations to a weird place that they couldn't quite back down from. 3.6 Mugs
· slices (wedges) of Vienna sausage
Zicam $7.99, Earn $7+up
In business, it has been my experience that the closer you are to the customer, the better sense of reality you have. This is not to say that everyone "in the field" is a genius and that everyone at "headquarters" is an idiot. Far from it.
How are you? I am missing you so!
XI
Not too shabby for 40k miles. I blew all the dust out, and put the wheels back on. I also replaced the hydraulic hood prop that had given up the ghost. The hydraulic props are nice, but they only last a few years before the pressure slowly bleeds out of them, and then they don't hold the hood open.
That being said, there's certainly some good country music out there if you look hard enough. Waylon Jennings' son and Alison Krauss are a couple examples. Perhaps, there's a good deal out there, but I must admit that I've stopped looking. Taylor Swift and Carrie Underwood have sent me elsewhere.
- Toothpaste sensitive 90 mL $3.29 each (Colgate)
For some of us, solitude is not just a need, but an ideal state. Some of us enjoy being alone so much, that we prefer it to being with people (that’s me – I confess!). But God has commanded us to love others: to share our time, our emotions, our beliefs, our knowledge, and our material goods. Yes, we bless others with our prayers, but we must also bless them with our lives. We must fill our cups and then we must empty them. Time alone and time with others. That’s the balance.
How does Jesus demonstrate his power and authority in the instructions for the Passover preparations he gives to his disciples?
With a family in Bonifay as crazy about their college football as we are, and with the FSU vs. Florida game on ABC and the Utah vs. BYU game on CBS College Sports simultaneously, Saturday was a great day that saw us sitting in front of the TV switching between both games and Nick Mecham and Nic Bell yelling and screaming at both games all day long, and both being hoarse after the games.
100g black olives (without the essence)
I guess I'm not disappearing altogether. The proof? I'm sitting here getting ready to post something. That's because shit's happening, and when that is the case, I want to post. So. No I told you so's please. Thank you. First up Serge and Georgie sleeping on the sofa because the one day it was REALLY important for me to sleep, Serge mucked it all up dreaming about something and pawing me in the middle of the night. Then snoring like a mack truck. Ugh. Banished to the sofa the following day.
Lesson 3
Therefore if any one is in Christ–new creation! The old things have passed away; behold, all things have become new!
Both your daddy and I can't wait to see you grow in the next year. We have lots planned for 2012, so we hope you are ready.
Make sure it dries completely, and then pull back the tape.
Today I have another freakily adorable DoodleFactory Ghoulie for you to drool over! And yes, the layout probably looks very familiar to you... same as my last post - I'm just loving these ruffles!! Little Miss Cort looks very dreary if I may say so, but I guess that's expected with the crummy weather we've been having lately... lots of rain... but the leaves are looking exceptionally gorgeous!!
He just froze and had a look of terror on his face like he was going to die.
The area behind the other chair (closest to our entry way on bottom right) often was the spot where we would put things that needed to leave the house, which makes sense. But it also often made it look cluttered and messy and let's face it, you open the door and that is the FIRST thing you see, followed by the entertainment center.
Release Date : 1 December 2010
Just Do It. You eat an elephant one teaspoon at a time.
..... half term has been and gone.... I apologise for lack of posts and comments recently but I made a promise to myself that when the boys are off school I should spend a lot less time staring at a screen......so
I've been seeing some tweets regarding a pre-game show featuring The Watchmen before the first tilt for the revitalized Winnipeg Jets. Watchmen drummer and Winnipeg Biz guy Stefano Grande have been in touch concerning the festivities, we'll see what transpires. Maybe Danny singing the anthem? I'd like to see Danny on skates. Make sure you get him a good helmet if he goes anywhere near the ice.
cause harm to all children), the major
Our Team name was SD Sole Sisters... get it? San Diego... "Sole" :) we thought we were pretty clever!
On any given day one might find me floating this refreshing river with my friends, or perhaps my little sister enjoying a day with my parents. This fact is where the beauty of the Comal lies. The cold waters provide a fun, refreshing opportunity to be outdoors in the middle of the hottest of summer days for all kinds of people.
through the noontime summer haze
I was dimly aware of all this history and assumed that one of the reasons no one knew US hops were so good was because Clusters lacked their cousins' virtues. Fast forward to Saturday, when I tried Double Mountain's Clusterf#%k, an IPA that uses the old hop in a way Henry Weinhard never dreamed of. With 75 IBUs of lip-smacking hoppiness, CF didn't nestle the hops in a subtle admixture of malt and yeast. No, this beer is all Clusters--and what a wonderful opportunity to see the old hop shine. It has all the American character you would expect, with intense citrus that was a dead ringer for passionfruit. It kicks off a lot of tropical fruit essence as well, suggesting mango or guava. It is every bit as sticky and vivid as you expect from US hops--and distinctive, too.
I feel the same way about the guidance I give them.I work hard to ask questions and prompt in ways that are vague and open ended. If my question or prompt goes too far I've lost the chance to see what they can do on their own.
Readers, if I saw this machine at the Chelsea flea market I might buy it for $50, maybe even $60. I had paid -- gulp -- $250.
get and all that you can make with this kit!!
‘Were these the actions of someone drunk, or out of his senses? How could you abdicate kingdom and riches,
That had been through the pits of hell
I did not mean a personal attack on Ms. Fluke But that is what you spent 3 days doing Rush, blasting her, calling her a slut, hinting about her sexual activity and demanding, for lack of a better term, sexual favors from her (The sex tape he wanted her to make). Maybe he was calling all users of contraception sluts, but that doesn't mean that the attacks were not directed directly at Ms. Fluke. The next lie was right after this:
We’re answering: “Yes. But only if you want lots of advice.”
The actors were not terrible but they were very poorly written in a poorly written film. The plot is driven by one stupid choice after another by the characters. I only finished this film to see how bad it could get. It might have been an attempt at comedy but it just wasn’t funny. It is not entertainingly bad, just annoyingly bad. I recommend avoiding this one or making people you hate watch it
They are in the cafeteria all groovin together.
In 1970 there were 100,000 Muslims in the United States. Today there are 9 million. Within 30 years there will be 50 million.
Standing on a busy corner, tears streaming down my face, looking impossibly for a taxi, a man pulled up and asked me if I needed a ride. I stepped into his car and told him I would pay him $20 if he would take me downtown to my boyfriend's house.
The only thing that's getting me down is my legs - it's like they can't hold me for long. They ache so much and throb. People keep telling me it's because I'm doing too much - I'm so use to being active. At the weekend Hubby took me shopping ( yes you did read that right ) two hours round Morrison's tired me out that much, I slept for 3 hours after. I just sat down and fell sleep. This isn't me at all, so it is getting me down a bit. My friend Simone as been round every other day, so the company as been good. She's tried so hard to get me back in the craft room, bless her.
As I drove to work in my usual hurried morning dash I watched in slow motion as an innocent little butterfly flew into my windscreen to its death… If that wasn’t bad enough it left its wing-prints there just to remind me of the sin I had just committed.
"Wow," said Sam. She leaned forward. What a weird name. Plus, she'd never heard of such a thing, except in some magic books. "Really?"
carefully cut the candy into small pieces. it is much easier to cut successfully when cold. actually, let me correct myself by saying that you should score it into which serving sizes you want when cold and then after it has sat out for a bit and softened, then cut it. use a very sharp knife.
Blessings, and may your Way be Powerful and Clear
One one occasion we scarfed down our heart-attack butty, and went to a friend’s house to watch the only Australian soap opera shown back then: The Flying Doctors. It was phantasmagorically weird: everybody was orange, the furniture was yellow, and the interiors of the aeroplanes appeared to be made out of Papier-mâché and twice the size of the exterior. People wore far too many hats considering it was 1985, and hats had died out 30 years previously in the rest of the world. And it moved even slower than our blood after the pie sandwich. In fact, the scenery seemed to move more than the plot did.
But I’d finally found my answer—a way to put some distance between me and Harold—middle school. There, I’d finally get to live a life minus one Harold McGee.
When referring to my particular spiritual path, I refer to it as a Path of Chaos. This is because, in the balance of the elements, as I see them, (7 elements: earth, air, fire, water, spirit/will, law, and chaos), I find myself typically aligned with chaos. For a more accurate, and slightly more precise answer, my path is eclectically based shamanism; though I am normally hesitant to admit to that based on my general opinion of how modern paganism utilizes eclecticism.
A USA Today story by Kevin Johnson ("Storage of evidence crucial to exonerations," March 28) makes an excellent point about all the DNA exonerations out of Dallas, which has seen as many innocent men walk out of prison based on postconviction DNA testing as the rest of Texas combined: The reason isn't that Dallas convicted more innocent people than everybody else, they just saved the evidence so it was later available for testing. Reports Johnson:
Architectural Design, Ed. Neil Spiller & Rachel Armstrong – Protocell Architecture, March/April 2011
It starts with packing up the car with a few groceries, a couple of bags of books and clothes, the dog and the cat.
Guarding Charles III, King of Spain, Naples and Sicily, Duke of Parma, was a plum occupation.
Understanding disability statistics is important. But insight into how consumers think about disability can lead to a conversation that truly resonates. Consider starting a dialogue with your clients by asking these key questions.
Pegs and pegboard
Go for the food, go for the coffee, go for brunch on weekends, but you might have to fight the rest of the masses who know what a haven this Haven really is. Also, being given Honourable Mention for best cafe in the March 2012 issue of Avenue Magazine (Edmonton) hasn't hurt business either.
The reason? When it came time for the parallel parking portion, I freaked. Despite having practiced for hours upon hours, it was like my entire memory of how to park was wiped away with the sight of the state administrator’s clipboard. When the second time came around — a whole, long-awaited two weeks later — I lined up alongside the cone, checked the mirrors, and backed right into the spot. No problems.
Nearly twenty years have passed since first hearing 'Sheela-na-Gig' on John Peel's Radio 1 show, and this is, amazingly, the first time I've ever seen her perform. I only managed it this time thanks to the good offices of Minerva McHenry from the LGMG who alerted me to the concert - and then I could only get one ticket! Sorry Min, and thank you.
The exhibit did not disappoint. Although small in scope, the exhibit is well worth a visit. From the exhibit - "His photographs are sensual objects, artifacts of a deliberately abusive production process in which injury and distress are not only allowed but considered philosophically."
around the shoulders
Myself, I’m pretty lucky. I’m back at my parents and have a fantastic support network between both grandparents. Hasn’t always been like this I struggled but admitted defeat and asked for help again I was lucky to have someone I could count on in this way.
Over the next several months, the group considered a variety of targets for attacks including the Group of 8 leaders meeting in Chicago and the Republican National Convention in Tampa, according to the FBI affidavit.
Happy editing!
“If it‘s a newco with a CVA on a side route then they can take control by 11 May.”
Just popped by the blog to check out the challenge to find that it hadn't posted, so hope you will bear with me as I am not sure what I am doing!!!!
Ballast Point Sculpin IPA
1 flown
Good waitstaff, on the other hand, are worth far more than the standard 15%--we often tip 20 or 25% for friendly service, keeping the drinks full (which can include leaving the tea pitcher on our table, if it's a busy time and section--we don't mind that), and keeping us up on what's going on with our food ("Kitchen's a little behind," or "It'll be out in a couple more minutes").
Twenty will not come again,
In my journey over the last few years, the question of who I really am arose power­fully and profoundly. Am I the physical being I see in the mirror each morning? Am I a soul living in this body that will move from body to body over many lifetimes? Is this life just an illusion?
Jingle Out!
Too often, we let shame get in the way. It clouds our thoughts. It’s a fog over everything. It’s a smoke. It fills the room and we cough, and even when we can escape it, when we return, everything we once loved still smells of the burning. It makes our happiness bitter. It changes our memories and scars them.
Now we had a plan and a date to work to.
Total Fat = 0 g;
4 Sunrise Serenade
Hello Pulp Friends,
An overlong explanation
The fellow with the red hat had just given what looked like money to the shirtless gentleman, and received something in exchange which he put in his pocket. I can't testify as to what happened, but I have a pretty good idea. There seem to be a lot of transactions on this street corner.
For five full years now I've been her sage and Santa Claus and pal and playmate and mother and friend. Now she'll learn to share her worship with her teachers ...which is only right. But no longer will I be the smartest woman in the whole world. Today when that school bell rings for the first time...she'll learn what it means to be a member of the group...with all its privileges and its disadvantages too.
Having read the prospectus, one of the most striking things is that the Government quotes its apparent commitment to localism, specifically stating that councils should consult local people to find out whether or not they wish to return to weekly collections.
I don’t know if I’ll manage to keep it up for a month, let alone until the tenth of May, but I’m going to try.
Talk with your financial advisers, especially because there is a reverse mortgage on the property.
I think this is the first time anyone has taken advantage of the rapid turnaround time possible on the Kindle and the monthly direct-deposit of royalty payments to raise money for a major charitable enterprise. This actually probably wouldn't have been possible before the advent of the ebook. (We're exclusive to Amazon only because of their payment policies, which are prompt and automatic, freeing up money as it's needed, not at the end of various bookkeeping quarters.)
West Virginia … watch Charleston to Clarksburg WV.
The book has so much practical information, including even a list of "Helpful Books, Blogs, and Websites" to visit to enrich your Paris market experience -- all of which I heartily endorse.
Come join us and see what it's all about...
The shopping’s not done and there’s nothing for stew
June 29 2010 Neuenschwander Ernst 83 – murdered 2001/ Panorama, Soetendal, Wellington, Western Cape updated information from daughter Marlene@vatclaims.com June 29 2010
A few months ago, I shared my enthusiasm finding Natural House, a company that makes natural household cleaning products with probiotics. Well, they've recently come out with Surfy, an all surface probiotic cleaner and just in the nick of time! I've been spring cleaning and this product is amazing!!
Cheddar-Chive Scones
On Friday the 13th, 8 lightning bolts hit the Golden Gate Bridge.
You can add that shit on Goodreads right here if you want to! As you can tell by its 3 review average of FIVE STARS, it is an important piece of literature already. GET ON THAT SHIT.
Whoa, what do you mean, "second leggy moment"?!? When did the first occur? Yeah, I meant to tell you, but in an earlier scene, a sex worker named Tinkerbelle can be seen lounging in a leg-friendly manner near the Chez Jackie jukebox, so, technically, Tinkerbelle is the first to be leggy in this particular film.
The "elite" journals of the time strongly advised parents to supervise the reading "of the rising generation during its first and formative literary experience"(a). The men and women who commented on children's books were convinced that the first books a boy or girl encountered imprinted an indelible pattern to which all subsequent ideas and impressions about the world would conform. The moral welfare of the rising generation seemed poised in the balance and they opposed the unscrupulous publishers exploiting the juvenile market with unwholesome pulp literature. Sound familiar? Further, "individuals who have taken to writing such children's books did so solely because they found themselves incapable of writing any other, and who have no scruples in coming forward in a line of literature which, to their view, presupposes the very lowest estimate of their own abilities"(b).
“He’d been lying flat for 12 days so we called a nurse to move him into a more comfortable position. Then he pulled out his feeding tube and asked for a bowl of ice cream.”
and if one day
Reflecto Boy can leave a room through any mirrored glass,
With all that you are to me; I loved you still,
The Four Holy Gospels stands in the historic stream of the beautifully hand-illuminated editions of the Gospels created many centuries ago. This exquisite and unique modern edition carries on a classic tradition, beautifully combining the words of the Gospels and original art, inspired by the text, and brilliantly executed for the glory of God.
I'll update in a week to see how this goes. Wish me luck!
I have a real fear of my teeth falling out.
Then it happens.
:: I repurposed a light blue bridesmaid dress (from my May 96 wedding), Jessica McClintock Bridal, size 6
In spite of Rick Warren’s efforts to now conceal all materials…video, transcript, etc…of John Piper’s recent interview of himself on May 1, 2011…well, too late.
The Strangler's pad is a wonder to behold from the cheapass 70's paneling to the Marilyn Monroe serving trays hanging on the wall! What a guy!!
 Map of downtown merchants, list of names, addresses & hours is included so you have everything at your fingertips to shop & buy local!
The kola tree grows to approximately 40 ft (12 m) in height, and has white to yellow flowers with spots that range from red to purple. The kola tree’s leaves are 6–8 in long (15–20 cm) and the tree bears fruit that is shaped like a star. Inside the fruit, about a dozen round or square seeds can be found in a white seed shell.
This is a community issue. Let’s look at it from the perspective of one child in one class. Have you ever wondered about the root cause of a child’s behavior? The disruptive child in your son’s class may not be a bad kid. He may be hungry and struggling to concentrate. He may be anxious, reflecting his parents’ anxiety about being unable to provide nutritious food at home. Imagine the positive impact — if this one child could become food secure, he/she could thrive in school, improve social ties and the entire class can benefit. Now replace the word “classroom” for “community” and the possibilities grow exponentially.
spatula; electric beaters; clean tea towel
Dear lovely readers of mine,
In any case, I am now committed, and think I'll be ready. I'm more nervous about this gig than I have been about any I can recall. That is good. This will build character, and it presents healthy challenge. Well, my first sober time playing in public, in Jamaica with the house band at the place might still be #1 in that regard. I threw up more than once in the minutes before going on.
The prospect of another dry sandwich loomed....
There was more to it than adolescent snobbery, though. The hobby really did seem to be changing by late 1985 and, while I was still as keenly interested in it as ever, it became much harder to find people with whom to play and, for the most part, the new RPGs coming out held much less appeal to me than those published in the years before. Issue #100 wasn't my last issue of Dragon, but I did let me subscription lapse not long thereafter; it would never again play as central a role in my connection to and understanding of the hobby after that.
There was a time when I could get up from the ground. At least, I think there was. Now when I fall, I have to wait for Chris to get home and help me up or scoot on my behind to the bed and hope I can roll over onto my knees so I can sort of flop up and pull myself up with the sheets. Straightening from a sitting position is nearly impossible sometimes. It just feels like I'm losing the fight by inches.
Think about a leg extension or leg press machine. Can you unilaterally press or extend 50+% of your bilateral max, making the sum of both unilateral contractions more than your bilateral max? Chances are you can. This is called bilateral deficit.
I love French Relations. It is far from perfect, sprawling on at times for way too many pages, introducing subplots for no good reason, changing the very nature of some characters - and yet I devour it hungrily every single time I read it. Yep, this is one of my go-to re-read gems. Any time I need a palate refresh from some difficult books, or just need a boost reading wise, I will pick up French Relations without hesitation. This is what my own copy of the novel looks like:
I have been searching every day on Craigslist.org to see if the perfect job will pop up. Last month, there was an opening at this local printing company–not just any printing company, but THE number one printing company in Hawaii (at least according to the Star Advertiser). This was the same printing company that I’ve been going to this past summer to get all the party banners that I’ve designed printed out.
I don’t know about you but when I’m not driving my thoughts tend to wander. I was thinking how many times the waters in my life try overwhelm me. I search for some type of false security – which always fails me. Or I try to swim out to an island of protection feeling like I will never reach its shore.
But to no avail.
Barefoot and Carefree
Employer: Council on Foreign Relations
And again go ahead and check out my guest blog post at From the Sidelines. You will love it.
**Here is a comment on a Bobbie Gentry thread from Tom Ewing's Popular blog: "I heard a touching story about Bobbie from the 1980′s. A couple years after her retirement, one of her Vegas male dancers became ill with AIDS. His lover told me they were penniless and about to be evicted from their home. Even though she was raising a newborn son as a single mother, she stepped in paid the bills and got her friend the medical care he needed. In an era when some people would not touch somone with AIDS she came to the hospital, held his hand and comforted him. She even paid the funeral expenses and made a terrible situation a little more tolerable for a dear friend. "
I just finished a great day today! (OK, who am I kidding? I have hours of grading, house stuff, important Pinterest pins to repin...) Each month I have a pizza night at one of our local Pizza Huts for my students and parents. It has been such a WONDERFUL opportunity to get to know the families without the pressure of school issues, projects, grades, etc. Tonight we had our largest turn out, and I am sad that we only have 1 left! Does anyone else do a non school activity? I'd love to hear about it!
Oregano
I'm going to do a little confessing here. I found myself guilty of the pair-of-peepers-but-cheeseburgers-in-the-brain kind of listening the other night at church. Now that I think of it, I'm not even sure if I was looking at Pastor or not. My mind was wandering...I mean REALLY wandering. I was actually worrying and fretting over something that hadn't even happened yet. I'm very talented in the area of borrowing trouble from tomorrow. I had just finished with, "What's going to happen?" and I was moving on to, "What are we going to do about it?" when I realized I had no clue what Pastor was talking about. "Eyeballs, Jane! Pay attention!"
“All the lies that are my life,” Fannin was heard saying into a bottle of beer, “chase me like rats fighting over a stale piece of hard cheese.”
I came up with a line that summed up pretty much everything
The fact is that, even though I enjoyed the TV show, I didn’t like the book at all. The book’s antagonists were much more depraved and sadistic than their tv counterparts, making Wizard’s First Rule much more violent, gory, and sexually explicit than I expected. If the tv series had stayed true to the book, it wouldn’t have been remotely suitable for television. In the show, Richard was tough, but noble, and Kahlan was a butt-kicking, knife-wielding heroine. In the book, their relationship felt affected and they were rather more weepy than I expected. Call me crazy, but I don't think fantasy characters should sob like an infant at the slightest provocation. Or really, ever.
Don't be fooled, you can be assured that the status quo will be resumed shortly. Our media overlords had no option other than to give Richard air time after Thursday's election, but he would be a fool to believe that aberration will continue, or that he will not shortly find that his speeches, policies and initiatives will join the blooded legion of racially battered white boys in the news exclusion zone.
It isn't that bad and get's better once u listen it couple of times, but still i think that models should stay on the catwalk, but who knows maybe singing is what she really has always wanted to do. But she certainly looks incredably good on the clip!
Excuse me for being about 5 days late on posting this, but, as they say, better late than never...
I was devastated, my little rubber giraffe was gone forever.
Thank you for dropping by my blog and leaving me your comments,they are always welcome.
The game promoted Hyundai hatchback Veloster. Players controlled it using the iPhone, by tilting to right and left and controlling the accelerator via the app. After the race the player’s score appear on the billboard against other racers. A good way to engage a group of friends trying to beat others scores.
and... that's it:
To the victims of 9/11, to the Firemen and Policemen who did their heroic jobs and lived or died:
One was by Holly Atkinson, former head of Physicians for Human Rights, on the topic of advocacy and professionalism: "Should Medical Professionalism Include Advocacy?"
Feel free to leave your shoes in the car and join us on our bare-foot grass dance floor
With regard to the newly formed MAC or Muslims against crusades, is it not the case that this to serves the agenda, hatred is fostered between the two groups violence occurs and the general public believing that the ZDL/EDL work for the countries interest albeit upon the extreme edges will always support the flag, always even if it is covertly support those who raise the flag, one need only look to the now occurring world cup for evidence of my hypothesis. So at a stroke the EDL/ZDL and the MAC create tension ,aid the agenda and indeed amongst the Muslim community who undoubtedly feel under attack the support will be for the ummah, for those who fly the flags of Islam, it is as if we are all blind, all so very blind to the actions of the state and indeed those who really govern over us. As nationalists we simply cannot and must not support this agenda, certainly we must continue to push to end non-indigenous migration but we must not fall victim to propaganda, to the push for conflict, which can only lead to more of our beloved troops dying and indeed many of our precious people.
La côte de Mount Desert Island, près de Southwest Harbor, vue de la mer (Photo credit: Wikipedia)
-two sectioning clips
Before the minimum wage was introduced during the Great Depression of the 1930s, there was no national minimum wage, or indeed any legislation to protect workers from exploitation.
As a son and daughter of the Most High God, (he is ours…Matthew 6:9), we partake of this interaction as well.
As we were waiting, the Move it Shake it parade came through!
seam binding a bit longer than your seam (to account for any measurement mistakes – you will not want to unpick your stitches once you have completed a long seam, and it is always better to have a little too much than not enough, right?).
From here no matter which route you took you’ll climb into Cressbrook by road and take the track opposite the church (not the chapel, wait for the church). This is actually signposted as a footpath so technically we may not be allowed to ride down here but it’s plenty wide enough and the surface is fine for biking. Then more road to get back to Miller’s Dale and the car park where I somehow managed to drop my chain on the final few yards.
The meeting took place at the Prime Minister's official residence in Sydney, Kirribilli House. The two seconds chosen by the contestants were: in the Keating corner, Bill Kelty, union official; in the Hawke corner, Sir Peter Abeles, prominent businessman. Those choices, alone, say quite a bit about the two men. Kelty and Abeles sipped coffee and chatted in a corner of the lounge while the two politicos thrashed it out. When the terms were agreed they witnessed the final form of what would become known as "The Kirribilli Conspiracy". Bob was to hand over to Paul in mid-1991. Of course, came June 1991 and ol' Bob found that, in the best interest of the Party and the People he couldn't keep the deal. At that point Paul did challenge, lost and went to the back bench. In the spirit of scrupulous honesty exemplified by Bob he said, "I had only one shot in the locker." He then started ruthlessly planning the next attack. In the week before Christmas he gave Bob the arse for a present, winning the second challenge by a few votes. Bob went to the back bench, promising to serve out his term to 1993 as a good constituency MP. A few months later he quit Parliament, blessing the ALP with a by-election which was won by an independent.
I perused the Internet from time to time over the years to read about where she was showing her work. Somehow I felt comforted that she was still alive. Other artists of her time (like Jackson Pollock) were long dead. I liked to look at her picture when one came up. When I read of her marriage to Robert Motherwell, I googled him. When I read of her divorce, of course, I knew that it was he that was at fault; not her. I watched a video of her working once and loved her Jewish accent. I read of her education at Bennington.
As long as the ribs don't interfere with my left torn labrum surgery in a month, I can have them both heal together, I suppose.
Steve Backlund has some very important observations to make about what he calls the “Enemy of Joy: A Critical Spirit”. Pastors are often dealing with this through their whole lives, both in themselves and people around them, so I have quoted Steve extensively!
It's been going well, but it's made for a busy mama. When I get home (between 12 and 1 depending on how much preparing I have to do for the next day) I find that Macie is usually just waking up. LOVE it! The only down side...I'M SO TIRED! I'm so excited to have another baby, but it's made the back to work transistion a little tougher than before. So the afternoons we have to be creative, also, it's been so hot that almost everyone is cranky.
Thanks for stopping by again! Have a wonderful day.
The dress waist is a little different than what you see in the pictures in the book. The tie is integrated into the waist. If you want a tie like the picture, use the Mary's Fancy Sash tie in the book and that will cover the curved waistband really well. It's a little wider than the picture but it looks great. That's what my student made for her sash in the previous post.
Strength: The Gators have an impressive set of guards. They love to run up and down the court and shoot the three. It’s entertaining to watch, but it’s also tough to play against. The guards are a large part of the reason why this team leads the SEC in three-point shooting at 39 percent per game. Erving Walker is the leader of the group as he is excellent at finding his teammates. This is one tough backcourt to defend.
We'll lift each other up from the dirt when we're lost somewhere.
We had no time to think now, only to act. We shook hands, wished each other luck. I said, “Go ahead, I’ll be right with you.” I threw my overcoat off as he climbed over the rail, sliding down facing the ship. Ten seconds later I sat on the rail. I faced out, and with a push of my arms and hands, jumped into the water as far out from the ship as I could. When we jumped we were only 12 or 15 feet above the water.
If I were going to give any advice to gayby or anyone else on finding this kind of love, it would be the following:
BREAKING BAD (AMC)
Danny Johnson, however, had very much been the one with the drop-dead gorgeous looks back then. He’d been the group’s major heart-throb, the “bad boy” of the band with his many tattoos and a reputation for drinking, women and wild nights out. He’d been the one who’d always got the most screams, the one all the woman had wanted first and foremost with his dark, sometimes unruly hair, piercing blue eyes and killer smile, but once he’d been taken the rest of the lads had been quite happy to accept his cast offs. Time had also been kind to Danny because, unlike his hometown – the small seaside town of Whitley Bay – Danny had weathered the years extremely well, and despite now being in his (very) early forty’s, he still looked incredible with the body of
Since we have these promises, dear friends, let us purify ourselves from everything that contaminates body and spirit, perfecting holiness out of reverence for God.
Each day she has a different topic
It’s not just cereal that can fall into this category.
This contest is the equivalent of two armies using incompetent battle strategies on behalf of two opposing causes that are equally unjust. The only two certainties are that everyone will lose, and the collateral damage will be terrible. As a neutral – still borrowing cheaply and not in the eurozone – Britain has by far the most to lose. This is because – outside ClubMed – we have the weakest, most irrationally biased economic structure in the developed West; and because our banking institutions remain the owners of a great deal of undeclared toxic debt. The resultant anarchy of scorched earth would leave us in the most awful pickle.
Bogus Olympic lottery letters are being sent to unsuspecting Suffolk residents.
add at the end. You can add more or less depending on taste.
by Union Square, and just stood there across from where
him in the
Well, whaddya know? I'm back and it's only been a week since my last post. That is a remarkable improvement, wouldn't you say? I've noticed a trend in my recipe posts. Have you picked up on it yet? I won't leave you in suspense too long, so I'll just tell you. The recipes I have featured on my blog thus far have been mostly beige in color. It's almost embarrassing. You might as well call this Cheryl's Beige Food Blog. Well, I promise to add a bit of color next go round. What color should I shoot for? Maybe, fuchsia? I don't know, I'll work on it.
I voted for Arnie twice, but it was a mistake. After his second term, I decided I would never vote for him again for any office, any time.
More pictures of my grandmother Alice Mimine Beggs, on her wedding day. Alice married David W. Beggs of Columbus Ohio.
And yet, where is the political opposition? Where is the accountability? Where is the scrutiny? At the very time that we need a free press, the Leveson Inquiry is demonstrating that we don’t have one, or rather we have a press which is so closely intertwined with the parties of government that they have come perilously close to merging and becoming a single political entity. Cash for access, the expenses scandal: are there no depths to which our governing political class will not stoop? The old distinctions between right and left have disappeared, and we are left with a situation where, whoever we vote for, the government wins. Even on the right, there is agreement: Nadine Dorres MP hit the nail on the head when she spoke of the Prime Minister and Chancellor as ‘arrogant posh boys’, while Nigel Farage MEP said we have a ‘government run by college kids with no life experience’. I would quote somebody from the left, but they are conspicuous by their silence, perhaps as the instigators of the current trend to totalitarian legislation.
Hennessy
I'm not saying I haven't encountered my fair share of men. I've met plenty of Mr. Oh-So-Wrongs, Mr. HELL NOs, Mr. Way Out of My Leagues and Mr. Ha-Ha, Yeah Rights. And let's not forget Loser Ex-Boyfriend (A.K.A. Mr. What-The-Hell-Were-You-Thinking, Moron?).
We are unsure when is the LAST DAY of our life.
For the food, I'm just going to go down the list of what was provided in our event program. ** Means I really liked it. ~ Means thumbs down. Anything else was fine, good- not bad, not spectacular.
let’s band together – 441,000 hits
After presenting a chapter-long list of complaints to God, Habakkuk says, “I will stand at my watch and station myself on the ramparts; I will look to see what he will say to me, and what answer I am to give to this complaint” (Habakkuk 2:1). And God answered Him.
I staunch the blood temporarily, (the youngster’s face is white as a
Each day you'll open a box and read the Bible verses related to the Story. Bible verses or references can be in the box with the item or kept separate. Explain how the item in the box relates to that Bible passage to give kids a hands-on understanding of what the Story is all about. If you also go over the previous days' verses each day, on December 25th, you'll read the entire story all the way through.
Are you connected with Quinnipiac’s flagship social media accounts?
He even had the name figured out:
I. PUBLICAN'S CHOICE: SATURNALIA RETURNS.
But I'm sure it will - I can't wait to vote in two presidential elections next year!
And I was entranced. The archaic language was unsettling for a minute or two, but after that I became absorbed in the story, language, and truly incredible acting.
of our mind and when you do not put any thought into
for each is peculiar and private to that soul.”
“Don’t you see, GB, it’s because you’re not human that I can bear to talk to you about it,” pleaded Derek. “And everyone says you’re such a clever ape who’s always studying human culture. You’re my only hope.”
Actually, can I just list my six kids and be done with it?
When I talked about getting the right suit, I recommended going the mid-range as far as quality and price are concerned. I don’t recommend this with dress shoes. You want to buy the best quality shoes you can afford. Go cheaper on your casual shoes, but if you’re only going to own one or two pairs of dress shoes, make them count.
Spring mix greens
Meanwhile, on the way back to the train station, I stopped at the Morrisons to get a few bits for tea. I came across one of the kiddie mags in clear plastic that contained some goodies. One of those was a foam set of Numberjacks numbers! Ryan was ecstatic when I showed him at home. He started counting with them right away!
So yeah, anyway, rant over.
The boy heard the gunshots firing behind him as he ran, taking in cold air with jagged breaths. He ran, and ran, and ran until he could only hear the sounds of crickets and owls. The boy was lost and alone. He felt tired and hungry, feelings still unfamiliar to him in his present body. Nearly a year has passed since the landing of his "spacecraft," as people had called it, and his name and face have spread throughout the West coast, along with rumors of a hefty reward. At last he had arrived to Washington D.C., a place known throughout the galaxy for its tolerance and welcoming of foreign visitors. The darkness was haunting, far more eerie than his bustling home planet which provided constant light and warmth for his people. Oh, if only these humans knew the things he could do to them. Instant vaporization, simply with one thought. But no, he had escaped that life. He was determined to pursue a life on Earth, after all, he had left the West after the incident with his adopted family. He wished to start over.
Cathedral of Learning, right across the street.
“Dimitri,” I try not to whisper into the night-time haven surrounding me, but the quiet in this room makes me feel like my words are breaking the tender calm of a mausoleum. His cold fingers on my throat silence me as my back arches like a pleased, pleasured cat. My hair is lifted from the nape of my neck and I can feel soft, velvet ice brushing against the sensitivity of my skin, making me shiver and want to crawl away, but also causing muscles all along my spine to contract as I lean closer to him.
Later, Cesare returns to his father’s rooms, where Alexander asks if there’s anything Cesare wants to tell him about that night’s events. Cesare says only that he’ll do everything in his power to protect his father and their family. I’ll say he will. Alexander sighs that everyone buys and sells their positions, it’s just that the Borgias proved themselves better at the game, which pissed the others off. They draw the line at murder, though. Well, maybe you do, Alexander. Cesare tells his father Orsini drew no such line, and now they’re one less cardinal that morning. Alexander toys with a cardinal’s hat and muses that he was Cesare’s age when he was made a cardinal (by his uncle, who was also a pope). Cesare realizes what his father’s getting at and tries to avoid the subject, but Alexander’s determined. He’s ready to make his son a cardinal, at the ripe old age of 18. Cesare once again begs to leave the church but Alexander won’t hear it. And as if he’s determined to make this the worst day of Cesare’s life, he adds that Lucrezia must be married off. She’s already 14, you know; time’s a ticking.
I was made of stone;
* Actually, he didn't tug on covers this morning; he was so absorbed in Legos that I was able to lounge in bed for several minutes and get up when I was good and ready. That doesn't happen often here. The above scenario is more common. Either that, or he climbs all over my bed and jabs with elbows and knees until it's downright uncomfortable to remain, and I end up removing myself gladly.
Isaiah 5:4
Police announced they would be moving in and gave people time to leave. According to UC police spokesperson Lt Eric Tejada, police gave a warning to leave every minute for ten minutes. Two people who stayed on the tract were arrested for trespass. 7 others who were waiting outside the property were arrested for unlawful assembly for failure to disperse after a dispersal order.
This is Thanksgiving Week in my homeland-the USA. I can think of nothing for which I am more grateful than my eternal salvation. I am overwhelmed when I try to imagine the price Jesus paid to ensure my life with Him eternally.
Thanks for the cards John, expect something from me within the next few days.
I have never used fishing line to hang a show. Most of the art she has hung that I have seen has hung from the crown molding with wire. But, I have made recent mental notes on how other places present a far superior show using the line, because it isn’t obvious.
As with any such site, one must have a bit of a thick skin to be able to ignore the few people who are not diplomatic enough, but most there are decent critiquers and pretty supportive. You just need to filter out the bad and concern yourself with the good.
for blocks
Quick scan of the local newspaper before setting off and an article jumps from the page “anti BNP demo Saturday” surely not? I read further and all is revealed Local MP for Lie-Bore Nia Griffith of the tir-gofal funding fame and Plaids Helen Mary Jones along with the usual bunch of misfits are going to hold a ,march through the town of Llanelli.
Because no one is perfect. No one is liked by everybody and people (especially kids) can be mean. Sometimes those with the greatest anger most need your life and they fight you just before you break through!
8 oz cremini mushrooms, sliced
No Cameras from the shadows offstage
The conditional structures are
I'm walking on eggshells again........
We talked about how mental we'd have to be to be talking about talking about boarding schools because who will mow our lawn then?
All in all however, it was scrappy, nervy stuff and it was therefore appropriate that the first goal came from a mistake. Agger and Carragher, as if they’d only just been introduced to each other, played a game of “after you”, “no after you” in dealing with a lose ball. Carragher eventually took the initiative and cleared straight into Cahill. The ball then bounced into Jelavic’s path who made no mistake. Despite a suspicion of off side it was a bad start from two experienced players. The result of playing Agger out position? Surely not, this was basic, schoolboy stuff, if in doubt smack it out?
Ah, Relda. I still have Relda somewhere. In my hope chest I think.
(I'd have them sing in a chorus, cheek to cheek).
I don’t think anyone will be overly happy with the price achieved including the buyer who will presumably continue to use the property as its head quarters, but at least it is a transaction in an otherwise moribund Irish commercial property sector which is still dangling on the whims of Minister for Justice and Equality, Alan Shatter with respect to planned legislation on Upward Only Rent Review commercial leases. The professionals which include Savills as property receivers for the property and CBRE as selling agents presumably won’t be complaining too much.
Scarf - Free with InStyle magazine
In those bittersweet moments, it hit me how much alike the two of us were. Her baptism story is much like my youth group calling story.
Tricep Dips (2 x 12)
In short, I highly recommend the beer tasting if you’re a beer geek like me and love the hops and barley.
sky
I tried to take a photo of the mani as best as I could, but I'm not satisfied. Here it is anyway.
In the weeks that followed since Neil left, Greek Prime Minister George Papandreou won a vote of confidence from lawmakers, easing concern the European nation would default on its debt. Storms battered the Philippines, causing floods and damaging crops and houses. Adele secured a seventh week at No. 1 on the Billboard Hot 100 with her song "Rolling in the Deep" while Gossip Girl star Blake Lively and Leonardo DiCaprio were spotted hanging out more and more often.
Jared wears a "figure of eight" brace to help keep his shoulders in place, but it is uncomfortable. Seeing as he has to wear it for the next 6 weeks or so, I am trying to figure out if I can make him something a little more comfortable.
Sticky Honey Soy Chicken Wing Marinade
and he is DIVINE!
Sorry for the rant, I guess its a symptom of withdrawal!
I wasn't happy with my last post. It seemed wrong to compress a busy, enjoyable weekend into a handful of sentences about my daughter trying to eat people. I wanted to gloss over it with a new post yesterday but Blogger decided to take Friday off without telling anybody. Now that Blogger's slunk back to work in shame, I'm going to do a rare weekend post.
The deed for which they hired Jonah? Assassination of current Manchu emperor in his palace in Peking.
A little too adorable – it was teensy tiny. That’s the thing with Craigslist though – no returns.
I could almost eat it! YUM!! And speaking of yum I've been playing with candlewick... all those lovely ice-cream colours....
This weekend we ate more (still stuffed), played harder (the girl scraped her face off falling off a skateboard....she'd dainty like that), and stayed up later than normal (stuck in a heated game of Sorry....we are party animals!)
Bleak options, very bleak…but honestly, since last week, my daughter has self harmed almost every other day, some requiring stitches. At this point, no RTC will take her, she is not safe enough, as she has continued to be on1:1.
Flooring- Silent Step. Style: Antique Oak. Color: Butternut.
4) Sunday’s Schedule,
got… wrong!!
where doing nothing was not boring--it was peace."
So over the next few days I hope to come up with some more food ideas - generally some light items that can be quickly heated up, any suggestions you have are much appreciated!
‘Paint my child!’ They blatantly request of the poor Painter, without a single notion of payment.
Add chicken and corn (don’t drain). Place banana in a small strainer or tie in cheese cloth and emerge in soup. Bring to boil for 10-15min stirring occasionally
Final Runnings 5.9
In her hands, your sanity hangs.
Integrating conclusions into belief
- J. Willingham struck out swinging
Romeo did not agree with the family divisions and he wanted it to end, even though he was still a kid, and so there was a debate & argument with his parent’s.
1:30AM – eat while still asleep. not so bad.
Every day Sylvia cooked and cleaned. She made everything in the house beautiful for her man. Her boyfriend came home from work, ate his dinner, watched television and went to bed. Sex was scarce to say the least, and apparently, not very romantic.
I will also ask you to not adopt another child…please. You can barely handle the one you have and let’s face it: with emotional baggage, potential mental issues, your incessant need to please the no-good men you invite into your life and the denial/delusion you carry around…it is definitely not a good thing. I am not even going to get into the fact you would be doing it for all the wrong reasons…because Brother Everything said to do it. Please stop wrapping yourself so completely up in a man and when he leaves…let him go and STAY GONE. I know you say it hurts so badly without him, but better for him to hurt you once than the hundred times he does when you chase him and try to drag him back. Get some self-respect and self-esteem so your self-image is not reflected by the fact you have a man, no matter how doggish he is.
This is the collector who has a lot of stuff organized (maybe all complete sets - or team set - or a player collection) but also has plenty of stacks (or boxes) full of assorted cards. At the time, I assumed most collectors fell into this category but based on the comments it seemed more people thought they were a Type 1 collector than I thought was possible!
I wish we had more time to think about tomorrow but we’re just too busy worrying about today.
Ouch! This one really hits close to home, Lord. I don't mean to be mean to the people I love. I don't mean to be impatient, but I am at times. Usually when I'm really tired, I think.
A manufacturing process for manufacturing a folding stairway comprising the steps:
George and Maggie Eads
D: Dancer-I love to go dancing although I haven’t done it in a while!!
½ cup butter or margarine, melted
Today's post on Kidlit.com poses a very interesting question: What does your critique group or partner mean to you? It's a must-read for evaluating whether you're growing as a writer within your group. It's important to be challenged and to challenge those you work with, in return. It's also important to provide justified feedback, not just commentary.
that others might be loved more than I,
There is no grand launch or ceremony. I'm frantically busy trying to complete Katie in Scotland anyway. But later in the Autumn I am going to the Cheltenham Festival, to the British School in Paris and giving a string of workshops at the National Gallery (details will appear on this Katie site as and when...), so Katie isn't going to be neglected!
Life just got in the way.
1- Paint your metal on your figure. Easy, done. Now, the next steps are done with a wash and some Tamiya weathering powder. I swear, I never learned to use that bastard, but I thought it would be useful. I scratch some powder on a palette and mix it up with some Devlan Mud wash.
That is not the least of the problems. The newer C-130Js are taking such a hammering on operations (plus losses to enemy action) that several could need an intensive refit by 2012. And it gets worse. Because the bulk of the C-130 fleet was supposed to be retired, there is a shortage of engineers and spares to keep the full fleet running.
This is a cat
And no one in the pale.
courtesy of Jen!
The thing that has been driving me crazy the most this year is this:
Sorry if you got the impression everything that comes from you is desirable. It's defintely not.
We've got bottles of chilled Radeberger at Paisley, and you don’t have to be a famous playwright or a member of the Central Committee to get some. You just need three pounds fifty pence in your pocket and a glass.
The La Niña is expected to be neutral by May or June and the tropical Pacific should remain neutral for the rest of the year. If this timing is right, the US should be able to produce a near average crop. Drought concerns for some areas, like Texas, until August.
11And they overcame him by the blood of the Lamb, and by the word of their testimony; and they loved not their lives unto the death.
Sobe blush - Nouveau (applied to cheek bones and blending back toward the hair line)
‘Well, I did sleep really well and I have been eating a lot lately.’ – Quote from the 5 year old when I asked him if he’d been growing again.
As we do, our troops will be coming home. Last year, we removed 10,000 U.S. troops from Afghanistan. Another 23,000 will leave by the end of the summer. After that, reductions will continue at a steady pace, with more of our troops coming home. And as our coalition agreed, by the end of 2014 the Afghans will be fully responsible for the security of their country.
Level 12: MP Cost: 14, Attacks up to 5 enemies, Damage: 121%, Attacks the enemies 4 times.
while lighting your cigarette stub,
First up is My Name is O by Sam Enthoven. We are big fan of Sam's writing, even if we think he has a very scary twisty brain that gives us books like Crawlers. My Name is O is a high concept action thriller, possibly set in the now, possibly slightly in the future. The writing is easy on the eye, the reader is never patronised, and most of all, it is a great story done well.
(unless you are on Pinterest, you won't get this post at all)
We love you so much! This last year as flown by, and we are really enjoying spending as much time with you as we can. Happy 11 months, my precious baby bug!
Once I started to make progress I dilated quickly from 4-5-8-9-Fully. We waited for an hour to start pushing to let move down lower so it would hopefully be easier. After 1hr and 2 mins of pushing she was born. She came out with her hands up by her face, where they were in all her u/s pictures and where they have been ever since. Brian cut the cord and the NICU nurses took her over to the warmer - it took her a minute to cry, but she eventually let out the faintest little wail…it was the most beautiful sound I ever heard. Tears fell down my face - as I looked over at Brian he had tears in his eyes too. It was amazing seeing Brian’s reaction to her - he was so in love with her, it just melted my heart. They weighed her and she was 5lbs 15 oz, smaller than I thought, and was 19 inches long. She got to come over to my chest and we did skin to skin - it was just perfect.
I made this pretty card with the colors of spring in mind and bird's chirping. That's one of my favorite things about spring, waking up to the birds chirping.
Two unique children’s books address the issue involving illness. The Princess and the Peanut ($15.95, Wild Indigo Publishing) deals with life-threatening peanut allergies. It helps the reader with food allergies understand they are not alone and that their lives to do not have to be defined by their condition. In a similar fashion, Even Superheroes Get Diabetes has the same theme. Written by Sue Ganz-Schmitt and illustrated by Micah Chambers-Goldberg, they will prove especially helpful to parents with children who have medical problems.
No longer will she have time to sit on the front porch on a summer day and watch an ant scurry across the crack in the sidewalk. Nor will she have time to pop out of bed with the dawn and kiss lilac blooms in the morning dew. No, now she'll worry about those important things...like grades and which dress to wear and whose best friends is whose. And the magic of books and learning will replace the magic of her blocks and dolls. And now she'll find new heroes.
Pictures above from our sick-nasty Land Before Time seven mile hike on Mount Tam (route here; can't recommend this hike highly enough). Highlights included a carpet of fetid adder's tongue (in the lily family, high five!), pink shocks of calypso orchids scattered like confetti over the mossy understory, and a drumlin of early lupines so profuse, so dewy, Hopie and I had to sigh and exclaim and invoke the spirit of Miss Rumphius. (Self-portrait taken in Bootjack Trailhead public bathroom, because I just couldn't resist all that red.) Expect SF posts for the rest of the week, one of which may or may not feature a palomino unicorn. xo.
Lots of secrets. Lots of closeting. That was originally what I was thinking about, what I wanted to work into the story. Tania being closeted, what kind of pressures that puts on a person and the horror of being outed. I’d like to make sure more of that ends up in the story. But the Captain is sort of a closet case too and just as concerned with secrets.
This however is not what this entry is about. Sorry.
Both boys had seconds and thirds of this, so we might try a chicken version next time and see how we go.
But still, I have been browbeaten enough that it’s likely my facebook will become a lot tamer now. Which I really kind of hate myself for. I hate that I am so easily cowed by people who I care about. I hate that a couple people comment hateful, spiteful, evil, nasty shit on my wall and I cry and unfriend them and only post silly jokes for the next twenty-four hours. I hate that now I am afraid to be honest and be myself because asshats are asshats. I just hate life when this kind of thing happens, as it always seems to. I hate that I am afraid of people. I hate that people are mean and cruel and petty and controlling and vindictive and hateful and arrogant and intolerant and just…assholes! I hate it that people are assholes. And I think that perhaps part of why I cultivate this tough exterior online is because I am so soft, so sensitive inside. I would never dream of letting it show, but I am.
wet on his chin,
I wonder if we haven’t see the same webby wonder apps from other media and entertainment industries simply because they haven’t been as turned upside down as music. TV in particular seems to be doing a good job from inoculating itself from the web, by hiding behind apps that require a cable subscription. But I question how long that will last. Movies as well may be somewhat more protected as well because sending movies around requires more bandwidth than may be convenient for some.
This time last year I was graduating from The University of Alabama. My to-do list consisted of planning a wedding, picking a city to call home and finding a job. Needless to say, I was a bit stressed. I did not see how life was going to come together, and I sincerely could not imagine leaving the Capstone behind.
The doll didn't give their dad a chance to answer. "I'm William Poppet. But you can call me Will." He grabbed the side of the trunk, lifted his body over it, and fell to the floor with a thump. Some of his dark hair came loose and floated about his head. "You wouldn't remember me, naturally."
We are honored to be featuring one of the Midwest most successful wrestlers in the sport today for the card set that honors the hard working men and women in the game today.
As some of you may have noticed, the posting on my blog has been very sporadic over the last couple of weeks. There is a very good reason behind it that I am not really wanting to get into at the moment. But I will say that my physical health and well being is not the reason, nor of anyone I love. With that being said, I am going to have to take a hiatus from blogging for a little while to get my mind wrapped around my new issues. I will continue posting on Fridays with The Best Topps Set Countdown because I do not believe in leaving things unfinished, just in case.
I’ve a confession to make, I buy way too many bras.
Silver Coin Purse and Black Wallet
In case you're wondering, I have no photos of Swarovski crystals, not because they weren't present but because I couldn't get my camera to record the glitter. But I was glad to see they weren't in a huge quantities made infamous by some quilts of years past, such as a big winner at Paducah that had 130,000 crystals ON THE BACK. Perhaps this is a result of the still-troubled economy -- who can afford them in bulk?
ME: Oh, ha ha… very funny. Did Doctor Ice Hands put you up to this?
And yes, Ive asked him to do just that.
Heck, no. We're dads, not miracle workers.
At this very moment, Beunka Adams is being taken to the Walls Unit in Huntsville, Texas from the Polunsky Unit in West Livingston. Mr. Adams would have left A wing A pod in12 building of the Polunsky Unit shortly after 12:00 CST chained, cuffed and transported in a convoy that included ranking correctional officers who are heavily armed. At the end of a 40 minute drive to Huntsville, Mr. Adams will be escorted through the back gates at the Walls Unit into the section of the facility that houses the death chamber. Upon arrival, Mr. Adams will be strip searched for the last time, given a new set of clothing and escorted into a cell just a few steps away from the room that has the gurney.
Is it the sudden strange heatwave sweeping across Massachusetts that has our feathers ruffled or are we both restless writers, itching for pen to page action? Tell me writers of the blogging world and onward–do you get this way? Suddenly nervous that your chance to make yourself known as an author is painfully, slowly, being wretched from your grasping fingers?
When cool enough to handle, grease hands and pull the warm candy with fingertips, pulling out to about 12 inches at first. Quickly turn candy back from fingertips of one hand to the other hand, then catch center and pull again. This will incorporate air into the candy. Continue pulling until taffy is light in color and has a satiny gloss, about twenty minutes. Pull into a long rope, cut with greased scissors and wrap in waxed paper squares, twisting ends.
I’ve bounced back, but not much has been going on.
The first thing up is the primary basis for existence. Any given threat organizes to serve several purposes. Knowing what your threats reason for existence is helps to give insight into what motivates them. Criminal enterprises including gangs and larger organizations normally exist and are motivated for the following reasons:
What was worrying me was that she would often have accidents at preschool. Quite often at naptime she would wake up with wet clothes, something that never happens at home. The school were encouraging her to pee before going down for nap and she always did. Then her teacher noticed that often she wasn't actually even asleep when these accidents happened. This had me a bit flummoxed. Why would a kid who had been potty trained for over a year pee her pants almost every day, specifically at nap time? I was constantly bringing new 'spare clothes' to keep in her cubby at school, Geekygirl obligingly slecting a new cache every Monday morning.
Part of the human predicament is that we do have to deal with such complex choices, where one thing can be an object of desire and an object of fear at the same time; we have to do that with a nervous system that still has most of its australopithecine reactions hardwired into place; and we have to deal with the fact that other people are trying to manipulate us against our best interests using those reactions. Politics is only one of the arenas where this is a major issue, to be sure, but the level of stress in politics is very often higher than elsewhere, and it’s thus far from rare for people who make nuanced judgments in other contexts to fall into extreme binary thinking when it comes to politics.
The day was absolutely 'Beautiful' as described with the 'Cardstock Favorites'
Here’s a quick look at ten of my favourites. It’s only a small selection of what’s available – there are loads of others around – and more are emerging all the time
C: William Vlachos, Alabama
One might wonder if, thanks to this close alliance between filmmaker and subject, Harlan County U.S.A. might be left open to criticism that it presents an unfairly one-sided distortion of the strike situation. But any such criticism, in order to be effective, must be accompanied by evidence of some sort: accounts of important events that might have been left out of the record, or specific information that might put the material seen on screen in another context. I am not aware of any such rebuttal.
*Thank You*
The yarn writer—like Mark Twain in “The Celebrated Jumping Frog of Calaveras County” or “Baker’s Bluejay Yarn”—uses yet another method: He tells outrageous lies, or has some character tell the poor narrator some outrageous lie, and he simultaneously emphasizes both the brilliance and the falsehood of the lie; that is, he tells the lie as convincingly as he can but also raises objections to the lie, either those objections the reader might raise or, for comic effect, literal-minded country-bumpkin objections that, though bumpkinish, call attention to the yarn’s improbabilities.
As we discussed last week, the more intense the differences between our two lovers, the more tension/conflict/interest resides in the plot.
Neither of those festivals have posted their schedules yet, but I'll come back and post when they have. Plus, I have to update my laurels!
Ps. also in this piece: blue and green fibers, pan pastels, one of my photos, a couple of old Dutch postage stamps, a vintage Dutch advertisement and words, a stamped, painted and torn scrap of an old project, a punch shape from Tim Holtz, gold Pearl ex, some metallic thread AND a lot of wax! Yes, that about covers it!
Ikea lights, Circa lighting picture lights in the bathroom. Jonathan Adler lamps. Shades of light for the smaller “cage” lights.
Larry has become a recognized insider: he’s a board member of the National Center for Missing & Exploited Children, an advisor to both the Family Online Safety Institute and to Facebook (yes, THE Facebook), and he served on President Obama’s Online Safety & Technology Working Group.
Point, meet counterpoint.
We wandered away from the kids section and people attempted to sell me beads from stalls even though I obviously didn’t need them.
we have this one precious day to truly be here in love, in life, in joy.
When I used it I found my skin was dryer than if I had just used their Sensitive Facial Cleanser alone.
Jane Austen would have been quite dangerous to give any present to, I think. I imagine she had specific and precise tastes, and would have instantly spotted anything designed to impress her. When it came to books, she would probably not have cared for anything remotely sentimental ( a lot of Dickens, then, even if she admired his craft…) so a few of the modern authors I might nervously suggest might include Anne Tyler, Carol Shields, Kate Atkinson, Julian Barnes (she’d love his “The Pedant in the Kitchen”) and Jane Gardam.
The most time consuming part of this process was peeling and coring the apples. Luckily my husband jumped in to core and cut the apples as I was peeling them, so this greatly sped up the process. So, if you have an extra set of hands around, grab them and have them join in on the fun! Plus, my philosophy is, if the recipe flops, and you had a helper, you can always put the blame on them!! Just kidding! ;)
But today, as children slept lazily until 8 and I had all my morning chores done without interruption by 7:30, I was reminded that this is coming to an end. So, while I can, I'm enjoying every second of this season. The 20 mornings that remain will be lazy, slow, relaxed and easy. I plan to inhale this time for as long as I can. First grade, third grade and fifth grade are knocking, but I'm not answering that door quite yet.
I ask about distances to hospitals. My own hospital is a mere 15 minutes away, with the Major Trauma Centre about 45 minutes. I know what the right thing to do is: we need to go to the Trauma Centre. I don't like these long journeys, but I know it is better to spend a longer time in the primary transfer from the scene to a specialist centre. The decision is made, and the crew get ready to depart. I think for a moment about intubating her, but decide that, as her breathing does not seem at all like that of someone with a significant head injury, we would wait and see how she goes.
In essence, this is naked ale. Avant-garde, no-nonsense, authentic, ultra-traditional, retro, post-modern - all of these phrases and none of them sum up what's going on here. But at the core of it all is a sense that the brew is exactly as nature intended beer to be, and it feels under no pressure to bow to the contemporary operating model. Instead, it delivers itself in a manner which evokes the feel of the smokiest of Victorian ale houses, it's unembellished freshness resonates with the sense of having just been gravity-poured by the cheerful but feisty landlady via an oak cask laid atop the overly varnished, ash-smeared bar.
● pictorial mood board
Iused a damp cloth to wipe off the wood. And that was it. We were totally done. Oh, right except for that part about attaching the mirror which I still haven’t done. But before we could drag it inside, we needed to figure out where to put it. I canvassed our house and decided that it would fit perfectly in our dining room. So in it went.
The Greek Titan Prometheus is far too dignified to be considered a trickster, but in other cultures, it is the trickster who steals fire or the sun for mortals.
if you like them more chewy then opt for the lesser amount of cooking time. i like the 14 to 15 minute range.
After their game – they won two to zip, whereas the gals lost four to one – the boys went beside the bleachers to stretch and cool down. I happened to glance over, and, by the wonderful glory of God, MSN was shirtless. “I’m not going to stare,” I said as I gazed at the tight lines on my very popular classmate’s stomach.
Saturday morning, 9:30, on our way to Middleson's 9:40 basketball game. The van sputtered. We made a mad dash to stash this family of five into Daddy's car including a quick carseat installation. Crank. Sputter. Nothing. Woudn't start. After several attempts we made it to the game. No problems coming home.
my favorite ones yet!!
I’m also trying to work on a more feminine voice, but I’m struggling with it at the moment, partially because I feel silly talking to myself, but it’s mainly because I’ve never tried anything like this before. Hopefully once I’ve got it sorted enough I’ll post some more videos here.
In the kitchen, the girls prepare hot dogs, and take a sex quiz. Arch and Chazz decide to film the garden, while mocking Nikki. Hal finds a library or study, and wastes no time stealing cigars from a nearby desk.
Dear me, I’ve gone an hour without food. No wonder I’m feeling a bit peckish…
3 cloves garlic - roughly chopped
James Bovell is broker/owner, RE/MAX Cayman Islands
Linds: Really?
David: There is a very funny phenomenon here in Ghana. Construction costs are high mainly because almost all the building materials are imported and, for a hospital, just add the cost of shipping all the equipment and paying the foreign 'experts' to install them plus their five star hotel bills - must I go on? It's even worse if the hospital is being built by the same people who are providing the loan for it.
1/4 cup beef stock
--The fact that it's ok to listen to Christmas music. People tend to look at me funny when I do that in July.
Then came out the magical powers. ”How could I be so selfish. I would break my great grandfather’s heart, who was smuggled into this country from Russia on a boat, not to see his great grandson Bar Mitzvahed. And being one of only a handful of Jews in my private school, it was my duty to stand up and accept manhood as a Jew. It was up to me to represent my religion.” Then my father snapped his fingers and my mother wiggled her nose like Elizabeth Montgomery in Bewitched and I was guilted into having a Bar Mitzvah. They never even pulled the word God out of their parental quiver.
4. Mohd. Rafi: Sagar Nahin Hai To Kya Hain
and brothers murdered brothers,
At the Ottawa Public Library, The Music Lesson is filed in the non-fiction section, and there would be some who would scratch their heads over that placement. The book has a fable quality similar to The Alchemist, and there are parts of this book that you simply won’t believe. But that’s the way Wooten would have it. He writes, “I won’t promise you complete accuracy or complete honesty, and don’t waste your time trying to figure out which part is truth and which is not. It’s what you get out of it that’s important. ‘Truth is your decision anyway’.”
Another exciting piece of news is the Heather Jenkinson Interiors is expanding! Yes, aside from the team I usually work with (architects, builders and a project manager), I am currently interviewing for an assistant. Being on the 'other side of the fence' is interesting - I'm so impressed by the quality of CV's (and lovely fresh-faced talent) coming in. I'll be sure to properly introduce the new addition to you once we're up and running.
High taxes in Connecticut are paired with the nation’s highest income per capita — $56,001 per person in 2010, according to the Bureau of Economic Analysis.
I haven’t been reading books lately. Having TGF around has kept me occupied, and I feel rude reading if he isn’t reading too (which happens sometimes, but not often). However, Reading Is Sexy is the one section of this blog that actually has any semblance of regularity in its updates. So, in order to keep it going despite my lack of literary motivation, I’m asking you, my dear readers, to pick what I should read.
Paul was to join us Saturday to go back to the park, but when I woke up I was discouraged to find thick smoke outside. It looked like fog. There is a wildfire (still burning!) in the Great Dismal Swamp down in Suffolk and the winds had brought the thick, acrid smoke to Willaimsburg. The girls and I had breakfast plans at my favorite dive in town, so we braved it out. Visibility driving was poor and it was stinky and tough breathing. The Colonial area was packed. Guess if folks are on vacation they'll still make the best of it and not just hang out in a hotel. For us, however, it made no sense to go to Busch Gardens in that air. The girlies and I hit a few stores for some back to school clothes shopping and headed back to Nana's. We called Paul and told him no hurry. Ugh.
Great Divide Brewing Company Hoss
Last Saturday morning, lawyers, academics and students from Hong Kong, Macau, Singapore, Australia, Japan and the U.S., all passionate about intellectual property rights, gathered at the University of Hong Kong for a round table discussion on intellectual property and policy. It was organised by the Law & Technology Centre of the University of Hong Kong (HKU) and the Intellectual Property Law Center at Drake University Law School located in Des Moines, Iowa. The 10th floor of the Knowles building with its great wooden concentric structure accommodated the participants for this purpose.
And now, they’ve gone public: According to Us at NYC’s Catch on Oct. 24, the two were “inseparable — they had their hands all over each other,” an eyewitness says.
Justice ended the night with an encore that started out with their new single “On’n’On”, another number that started out slowly and built up to a massive finish. They mixed in the lyrics from “We Are Your Friends”, one of their very early, catchy creations, and left the audience with the echoing mantra: “We are your friends, you’ll never be alone again, well c’mon.” The line rang out over the audience, a very true sentiment for a crowd crushed in on every side by old comrades and newly acquired dance partners, everyone sweaty and happy from the supercharged Justice performance.
My eysight far too dim,
It’s not that I think post-rock is played out. Well, actually it is, but the problem is much bigger than Mogwai’s new album not packing as much punch as Young Team or bands like Mono, Explosions in the Sky, and God is an Astronaut (though they’re at least worth feeling sorry for) who make a John Cage-like study of repetition and boredom in too many of their songs. It’s so bad that I can’t even listen to the classics anymore. I actually have no desire to watch the sun rise out of my window with Lift Your Skinny Fists rotating on my turntable, once again revealing the grandiosity of life to me through a fog of noise and strings. I don’t even want to listen to Tortoise, and I haven’t been able to get into Stereolab yet, though they have a vast discography, so I’m not worried. I have, though, craved Slint’s Spiderland for the past couple of months, an album that introduced a more naïve version of myself to the type of evil heavy metal that drowns out with distortion and covers with big hair. This particular craving has, I think, much more to do with Britt Walford’s intricate, syncopated drumming which constantly varies itself in a surprisingly organic, yet very controlled manner. The guy can fucking drum is what I’m basically saying, and that, combined with a rawer version of Joy Division’s Unknown Pleasures soundscape (or am I talking out of my ass?), is just enough to make it irresistible when I’m driving in the rain, bored, looking for something that rocks, and in the right mood for odd time signatures.
Well, I just finished watching DAY 2 of Chou-party (yea, this time its divided into 2… and each is longer than previous concerts Nico has had) and all I have to say is… IT BEAT MY EXPECTATIONS!
'Do you remember standing in the shower last night?' I asked. He looked at me as though I was a complete idiot!
Obviously you’re going to have to send your music to the person you’re emailing because otherwise they can’t write about something they haven’t heard. There’s a number of ways to do this, and there’s a number of ways not to do this.
When Obama nominated a candidate for the Supreme Court, he consulted with my old boss, Orrin Hatch, first.
One dream scene involved Treyvon Martin parent’s going back & forth from court in their trial against George Zimmerman, but I have no idea how the trial was going, I would only see them leaving the court-house each day.
But the sheep guillotine? That’s crazy, right? Is that art? Would it be art if they decided not to kill the sheep? Or only if they decided not to kill it despite the results of the online vote?
Have you guessed yet that our challenge is to :
Where do you want to travel to? What's your dream vacation?
Now I live here, San Francisco. I still feel uncomfortable and unsure of myself at times, as the city continues to stretch me and force me to grow. But I am living the dream of my imagined life. This life is full of challenging work, in a city ripe with possibilities, surrounded by an ever expanding band of friends and colleagues that challenge me to become my best self.
Half way living
So, this Wednesday I’ll step into St. Joan of Arc Church, take ashes on my forehead and be reminded that from dust I came and to dust I will return. And, I’ll take my fist steps down the road of a 40-day Lenten journey. I’d like some company for anyone who cares to come along.
KIDz CITY!
In the 'liturgical books of 1962' the feast is cut down to III Class and loses first Vespers and the festal Compline. Mattins is cut down to one nocturn of three lessons. At Lauds the commemoration of St. Peter is truncated to the former oration being added to the oration of the feast under one conclusion. At the Hours the antiphons and psalms are of Wednesday, not of the feast. At Mass a commemoration of St. Peter is added to the collect of the day under one conclusion. The Creed is not sung. At Vespers again for a commemoration of St. Peter his oration is added to the oration of the feast under one conclusion. There is no commemoration of St. Timothy. Compline is ferial.
I’m honored to request Your high benevolence to pay Your attention to the incorrect and unethical behaviour of French accountants, particularly the unfair business practices in their duties.
Arch tries to seduce Muffy in the hallway and fails, then tries opening random bedroom doors. He hears moaning behind one, finds the second one either stuck or locked, then walks into the third one and sees Chazz and Nikki screwing like bunnies. He eventually settles for reading porn. I swear, this movie has a 1-track mind.
Ginger finely chopped -1/4 teaspoon
This may be sad for some but I have lived on the same road my entire life so when I got married we built a house next door to my parents. Well, this has been such a blessing because my parents are right there to help out whenever we need them. Anytime they see Nini and Papa outside they love to run over to their house to see what they are doing.
One wonders if our Harvey lives in a cave, in a tree, on a deserted island? I’m happy to introduce myself, so that Harvey can meet an actual living North American homosexual in my native habitat. I would be able to laugh this off, save that she has a significant following with her organization of hate. I feel sorry for those that live in Columbus, Ohio and for the state in which I was born, for Mission America and John Bohener have permanently marred the state–that’s just a dirt that won’t come clean! Judging from her makeup and hair style, I will admit she probably does not know any gay folk because we would not allow her in public with that hair. Hmm, Michele Bachmann’s hair has been looking good lately, so I wonder who does her hair? Perhaps her husband, Marcus?
I sometimes dream of a getaway - the chance to get away from my problems, from bills and job-hunting, from the stresses of everyday life. My ideal getaway location? Someplace hot, with swimming and my choice of adult beverages. Someplace nobody would bother me, where I can choose to do whatever I want, whenever I want. Someplace where I only need a bathing suit, a sarong, a hair clip and my sunglasses. Paradise.
The various models of the watches are available for the customers who are sifting the numerous collections to find the perfect watch according to their needs and likes. One cannot only find extensive functionality featuring models in the various watches retails, but also, on the World Wide Web as well. The online shoppers for the watches find it easier to sift through the various collections of the watches by wasting lesser time in window shopping with the help of simple clicks when viewing the online product galleries on the virtual retails.
Heavenly Father, I thank You for always spurring me on by Your grace and goodness. I am always humbled and astonished at how You won’t relent in making me Your own. I love You. Please keep me in the shelter of Your wings and hide me from the wicked who assail me. Amen
Outside my window... A cold but bright day. The beautiful colours of trees and foliage everywhere ablaze with Fall beauty.
It got me thinking, as sex education in schools (and in general) has been a hot-button subject (is it bad that I giggled at the term 'hot-button'?) with me since my first year in university when I did an independent study on the advent of the birth control pill.
My hope is that Debbie has met that special someone she had been longing for …….. PEACE.
The construction went together smoothly. If I were to do it again I might modify the bodice just a little bit to reduce the amount of gathering because it tends to pull the neck down a little, it's not super noticeable but that is something I would want someone to tell me if I were about to embark on this project with knits. I could probably adjust the straps to fix it but I haven't had a chance to look at it yet.
Greenfield ♦ At the Celtic Heels School of Irish Dance Summer Workshops children can join in the fun of the jigs and reels! Two spacious studios and a craft room will enable the groups to work at various ability levels at the same time. These classes will include a combination of balance, coordination and movement. Individual Step Dancing as well as group Ceili dancing will be done throughout the day. An introduction to rhythm and timing is approached by using both foot and hand cadences. Each workshop is broken up into 1.5 hour segments so you can sign up for one or more per week and workshops start at only $55. Please refer to the website to see what times are offered for your child’s age group.
Moon, the Mod whippet made sure that the coast was quite literally clear before peeping down at the Jack Russell's exposed genitalia....and then lied!
Bedford Centre
-Josh gets home from Kalamazoo
There is the beautiful Merchant in the old, and recently renovated, Maritime building on Gravier St.:
Frustrated and in a Starbucks-blues mode, I drink up the last drop of
I have no idea what to use as a title for this post so I just put what first came to my mind. Right now I'm all hepped up (Hopped up?) on double espresso (expresso, really because fizzbangwow!) and peanut M&Ms (Sugar and Caffeine are my drug) as Husband and I settled into an afternoon flick locked in our den/office/games emporium to watch Inception. It was kind of neat. I want to know what Freud would say about it after he got over the wonders of blu-ray of course. We let the kids have the other TV for any movie of their agreed choice with strict orders not to talk to us. We got interrupted once, and she got a flea in her ear and may never return again as she quivers from the double assault of "GET OUT!! Wait - Are you dying? No? GET OUT!!"". You will have no idea how long it's been since we've had a date night without kids. I can't even remember the last time and I'm sure even then, my heart/mind wasn't in it worrying about the kids. I'm such a drag.
G is for gross food: Remember when I said I was the pickiest eater I know? Well that means I think ALL THE FOOD is gross. Okay, maybe not all of it, but definitely mayonnaise, eggs dipped in ketchup—actually, ketchup on anything that isn’t a burger or fries—runny eggs, stinky eggs… Oh, okay, I pretty much always think eggs are gross. What well, I could go on and on…
At about 1.40pm, the crowd began to move forward led by Ambiga and other leaders of Bersih and we were joined by others along the way. From my vantage point, I could see that there were plenty of people all the way from Pudu Sentral up to the junction of Tun Perak/Tuanku Abdul Rahman Junction and there were more along the major side roads.
What’s Good: Ajay Devgan and Anil Kapoor’s performances; a few action sequences.
Hypothetical situation (entirely based in FACT):
The Orangutan Project (http://www.orangutan.org.au/index.htm) is calling for donations to rescue and rehabilitate orangutans in Borneo affected by deforestation caused by Kayung Agro Lestari (PT KAL).
You became a hero and a villain,
You've probably noticed that One Hot Stove has a new look. On Friday, I was in a mood to do some long-overdue renovation in this space, so I cleared out the clutter and painted the walls in pure white for the cleanest look possible. Now I think the look of the blog better reflects the way I want my life to be- uncluttered and simple. The biggest change is that I now have pages (like the recipe index, contact form, an About page) as tabs at the top of the blog. Thank you, blogger, for this great new feature.
Early spring, which is April/May in our climate
Fly Paper by Persian Claws
First we start off with one of our participants from afar, my friend Kirsi, all the way in Finland. Kirsi requested that I post her palette and creation on my blog, and I am happy to oblige.
If your wondering on how to make the eggs I just bought a bag of plastic eggs and a hydrangea bush that I pulled all of the flowers off and glued them on with a hot glue gun its a little time consuming but they turn out so pretty! I am going to be making some more for some Easter tablescapes. We are hosting Easter this year so I will be sharing with you our tables soon!
Mike Sweeney (Hugh Dillon) is a homicide detective from Toronto who moves his family to suburban Durham County to start over after his partner is killed and his wife Audrey’s (Hélène Joy) breast cancer goes into remission. However, he soon discovers that his neighbour and childhood nemesis Ray Prager (Justin Louis) may be a serial killer.
Feldman’s first book, Butchery on Bond Street, tells a similarly sensational, albeit more gruesome, story of the murder of a prominent Manhattan dentist, Dr. Harvey Burdell, and his mistress, Emma Cunningham, who was suspected but acquitted of the crime in a trial that made front page news for months in 1857. Thirty years later, Cunningham ended up buried in Green-Wood, just a few hundred yards from Burdell.
TLD: You're also working on a childrens album.
Marley
Today I'm in a good place.
It must be noted that in demonstrations of the Albanian minority in Skopje, many Albanians appeared wearing symbols of the UCK, the Liberation Army of Kosovo, that achieved autonomy for that province of Serbia.
So what is this stage anyway? It’s not nearly as important as the “we’re seeing each other” stage and usually doesn’t constitute exclusivity unless both parties have discussed it doing so. When it does, people to start using terms like “exclusively dating” or if you’re a word jerk like a guy I dated back in the day, you might say that your “making a concerted effort to see and date only each other.” Either way, the fact that you have to point out the exclusivity proves that it’s not a given.
“A parcel of land of 102 acres at Bayan Mutiara was valued by the federal government land and survey at RM65 per square feet (psf). That is about 2.8 million per acre.
I was back in the hospital again, days before I was to enter a rehab, having fallen and broken my nose in a blackout. For three weeks after that, they, the hospital, the detox, and then the rehab, wondered if my brain would come back enough for me to live a normal life. Amazingly, it did. Amazingly, after another rehab, and two jail stays, and a 6 month half way house, I finally got sober, but she, the one who was trying to kill us, lived on, this time, feeding on shame. She had plenty to eat, even when the rest of us didn’t. I was getting stronger, and her far, far, weaker. What finally killed her, the protector, and the queen of dissociation? I believe in was the arrest that led me to spend six months of the last year in prison.
Records have potential to develop game spirit. Records always inspire player to perform extraordinarily but have managed to make records. Cricket lovers cannot keep themselves away from eyes of the natwest cricket games online is allotted certain marks defined by using website. To play the natwest cricket games online. If their favorite sport, game, film, books or any other thing that fans can get varieties of cricket forum.
Congratulations. You may grab your top three badge from the sidebar.
I've never shown this side of the room before because it's not finished. The drawers will also soon be replaced by built-in drawers to match said closet doors. Doing it yourself teaches patience:)
Jews played an enormous role in creating the liberalism that poisons our society with its PC lies. They play an ongoing role in perpetuating it. Would you agree that non-Jewish Whites have legitimate reasons to see this as “bad behavior”? Jews have benefited greatly from the protection afforded them and all the other “minorities” by PC. Would you agree that it is reasonable to propose that these observations together conform to the spirit of the two halves of your MMRILS law?
Sumatran orangutans are critically endangered with only 6,300 in the wild while 55,000 Bornean orangutans still exist.
Cold nights are too
2 Cor 13:14 (Phi) The grace of the Lord Jesus Christ, the love of God, and the fellowship that is ours in the Holy Spirit be with you all!
In fact, I recommend you use organic vegetables at all times… if you're able to get them.
Upon the British party: O, untimely death!
Add a poem as your email signature. Write out poetry with sidewalk chalk. Staple a poem to a telephone post (beside those music gig flyers). Leave a poem with your tip when you dine out, and, please tip generously. I’m distributing packets from Found Poetry Review. These are only a few ideas. Let me know which other methods you’re using to spread poetry.
As every student of Plato knows, if something has a relation to the soul it has a relation to the city. Thus if our theory is anything more than the smoke it purports to explain, it can be used to analyze political phenomena. For example, in recent years we have witnessed a concerted effort to sterilize our erotic attachments, to sap them of their danger but also of their vigor. The flat, unerotic words we now use for these attachments confirm this. Instead of “lover” and “beloved,” we now have “significant other” and, even worse, “partner” (a term which lends to the affairs of the heart all the excitement of filling out a tax form). Given this environment, it is no wonder that our most vigorous moral war waged today is against cigarette-smoking. Nor is it any wonder that this war’s only rival in intensity is the one in favor of “safe sex,” for condoms sterilize sex not only literally but figuratively as well.
Some of the signs being carried by teachers bore such slogans as:
Rakeback will be the Equal to an Unlimited Poker Bonus
Best post I've seen on it so far (linked in the comments) is this thoughtful talk about orientalism, exoticism, and who is asking these kids questions/editing the video, at "Adventures in the 4077th" It also uses the word "Koreaboos" which is a word I would love to see, read and hear more often.
Eldred-Grigg, Stevan - BLUE BLOOD (1997)
“With an estimated 20 000- odd white rhino in South Africa, this decline in average sale value reflects a drop in asset value of the country’s white rhino of R1.5bn,” he said.
Mike Morin started for Roseburg. The senior right-hander gave up three runs in the first inning on a two-run home run by Corey Wynant and an RBI single from Stefano Sparacino. Crater starter Chris Painter held the Indians offense at bay for the first two innings, but Roseburg scored one in the third and two in the fourth to tie the game.
126) the calmness that washes over me as I work in my veg garden, no matter what.
Michael Bascum Selsor, 57, is scheduled to be executed May 1, for the first-degree murder of Clayton Chandler, 55, on Sept. 15, 1975. The U.S. Supreme Court denied Selsor’s final appeal on Feb. 21.
Near the end of April, NABC’s team gathered to brew our first-ever two batches of German-style wheat ale, and I’m happy to report that neither of them is representative of the standard, everyday Hefe-Weizen formulation.
05 Marden Hill-Into The Future
Still, this has been only one facet of his interaction with the law.
Current proposals for temporary tax incentives and even the billions of dollars allocated for small business funding (which are not even guaranteed to go to small business) will have zero impact on entrepreneurship and small business growth. If every cent of the $30 billion went to the 27 million businesses in the U.S.[iv] each would receive about $1,111. Only including the 6 million businesses that currently have employees, the figure jumps to $5,000 per business. $5,000 might buy a small used car, but it is not going to be enough for any business to invest in growth, hire an employee, or substantially market its products and services. Offering 1 million businesses (only 3.7% of all businesses or 17% of businesses with employees[v]) enough to hire an average employee for one year, or approximately $30,000, would spend all of the $30 billion. But even this dearth would not give an incentive to hire since businesses plan further than one year in advance.
The album that followed didn’t entirely live up to the promise of the single (not surprising, given its apparent history), but definitely had its charms. I may talk more about it later on.
blue cheese crumbles (in the freezer) 1 bunch fresh cilantro
Back off Judgy Mc Judgersons. I can peer up your curled nostrils from where I’m sitting and it’s not pretty. Dare I say, I’m not alone in my style crush. Just ask Henry Holland who recently tweeted of the Mr. Carrilho’s boho sensibilities “Can't wait to buy some incense and a sarong off Wagner next holiday” and quite astutely likened him to John Galliano (albeit after eating carbs).
My room is definitely not finished, even
"Not that I know of."
5. Finish blending your colors. Add a little more indigo to the crease, and a little more white to the inner corner and brow bone to make your eyes pop. I added white cream eyeshadow to my lower water line — lining your eyes with white liner will have a similar effect. Finally, add a few coats of black mascara.
XBOX live(for free):
What are some of the things your best friends have said that made you laugh?
The sponsor for this week is Whiff of Joy! Make sure to check out their site for the clearance stamps, will be going out of rubber, so last chance at some darlings! The prize this week will be Oakley with Bauble.
Up my fever with your burning mouth
I sat there waiting my turn and then the mahatma was in front of me. My eyes were closed and I felt him put his finger on my forehead. Nothing happened at first and then suddenly I saw a circle that opened up and became a stream of colors and light images. I just sat there taking it all in and feeling special that I had now obtained the first part of this secret knowledge. I opened my eyes and looked around and everyone had the same goofy, blessed-out smile on their faces. We had been initiated and we had seen the light, literally!
9/10
I wandered paths the ancients knew
Hot Pink Ric Rac Ribbon
Once I make it back to Orgrimmar, it’s usually time for afternoon tea.
If you are booking a space and then looking for an outside Kosher Caterer, then the world is your oyster, because you can design a menu around the season and your tastes, just as you would with any other kind of catering (with Kosher Provisions in mind).
the random knowledge of the supernatural in that film too! Sad thing is, I actually think this movie is a step down compared to her last stint as a poorly written racial stereotype…in that movie, at least it made sense, being in the Louisiana swamps. This time it’s just ‘hey! We need a cheap way to shoehorn in bullshit explanations for the supernatural stuff in the movie; go hire a black actress!’
9/11, the story there, was just so full of holes and contradictions that they were losing a significant part of their brainwashed audience – including myself, because I was a high-level brainwashee.
I would Dance again"
How could they have kept this a secret from me?
Described by Alan Borg, a former Director General of the Imperial War Museum as "one of the finest sculptural ensembles on any British monument." Goscombe John designed 'The Response 1914' as a narrative sculpture depicting soldiers marching off to war watched by an angel while women and children bid them farewell.
- Sift the flour, ground almonds, baking powder, and salt together and keep close at hand. Toss the sugar and in a large bowl. Whisk in the eggs, beating until the mixture is pale and foamy, then whisk in the crème fraîche and almond extract. Switch to a large rubber spatula and gently stir the sifted flour mixture into the batter in three or four additions—the batter should be thick and smooth. Finally, fold in the cooled melted butter in two or three additions.
- I say: Yes we do, It’s Kenny f***in Powers (without the swearing in the middle).
1 retraction
I held my breath as I opened the front door and we walked in. My daughter took her first look around, saw the two inviting parlors off the main entrance, gazed at the grand staircase leading upstairs to the bedrooms, walked into the dining areas that would hold the wedding reception and dance, and then she smiled. She smiled her famous, face-lights-up-completely smile that can break hearts or mend them, depending on the circumstances.
If You believe that You can fit in, that You are the person we need please go ahead and register on the forum. The amount of new forum moderators that we are looking for is about 2, or else 3. I will leave this request open for a 30 days period of time, starting from 1st of September 2009 all the way to 1st of October 2009… so, I wish You good luck.
Beginning on this first day of November, I will be posting, along with many other blogger and flickr folks, a month long celebration of all I have to be grateful for. Seems fitting to start with HOME. Even more specifically, my physical HOUSE. I am so thankful to have a beautiful, albeit small, house that is structurally sound and protects and keeps me warm and safe from the environment. My dad helped build this house and it has many special touches that make it just perfect for my daughter and me - now just me. It is situated amongst evergreens and hardwoods in such a way that I feel I am the only one around. I love my house... it is home.
Example: Announcer: “And don’t forget to tune in to tomorrow’s Nissin Cup Noodles Bowl, sponsored by Centrum Multivitamins: ‘When you eat Cup Noodles, remember to take your A to Zinc!’” You: “Cup Noodles Bowl?! I thought they closed that place down.”
That pretty much sums my week up. Hope you enjoyed this update!
Few people will end up realizing what it's like to lose an entire way of interacting with the world around them. It would be even rarer (except in a movie type "your ears or your eyes" situation) to be given an actual choice. But maybe it's worth thinking about.
15:00 Break
EK Success Paper Shapers Retro Flower Punch
It was the late Spring 1981, my world was a disaster and my family was in shambles. All hope of reconciliation between my parents was gone and without going into the gory details, it was ugly. Uprooted, heart broken, and completely friendless I found myself in a new city, a new house, and a new school. I was 13, which is a horrible age to be a girl under normal circumstances, let alone the ones that were facing me.
Jo Lockwood is a National Parks Ranger who has recently taken up a new job at a newly-declared State Forest in north-western NSW. The solitary life doesn’t much bother her, she enjoys her own company and the peacefulness that comes from working with nature. That peace is shattered when she discovers the dead body of a man who has been brutally tortured not far off a walking track.
Moving on. Kelly says, "Jill asked me to help design her handbag, and when she invited the girls too..." I was waiting her for her to finish with "I was thinking that that wasn't such a good idea because they're pretty young and HAVE NO BUSINESS DESIGNING $16,000 HANDBAGS." But no, she says the exact opposite: "Then I knew I wanted to go!"
As far as this philosophy business goes.....If I ever think of anything profound I'll let you know.
A trip to Bouchon wouldn't be complete without some croissants as well. Croissants are by far one of my favorite pastries, with the buttery, flaky layers that are ever so delicious! You can tell that they use the lamination technique here, where they make the dough, and wrap it around a giant piece of butter, folding it over and over, so there are hundreds of delicious layers. This is definitely the case here, and what is there to say other than awesome.
Mike: RuPaul only appears in a cameo.
Standover = 30.75/28.75/27.25″. The captain’s top tube length is a 58 with the design effort towards a reasonably low stand-over height. It has roomy stoker compartments at 29″.
Dale showed me a photo of a poisonous false morel and then offered this advice: “If it ain’t hollow, don’t swallow.”
In the background since some have
This cute "3-D" little pink piggy has a special day planned! She's wearing her best purple bow! This design is just right for so many occasions: birthdays, birth announcements, baby showers, and any others you can dream up! Feel free to add your own words to this design too. You can make the picture smaller, bigger, or move it around if you'd like with the +/- and arrows to make room for your words -- maybe a special someone's name? You can also change the background color via the customization tools!
I am pathetically excited. Second Novel Syndrome my arse!
I have no idea how to post the actual picture of the actual picked number from random.org so you'll have to trust me on this.
If you know someone who never attended school, and is somehow antisocial, really think about this question. I think it's one of the most important ones to consider. When I was in school, it was the shyest, most awkward kids who got picked on incessantly. I don't see how that was going to help them be more social. They didn't learn how to get along with other people better. They spent their days trying to ignore the barrage of put-downs.
It was a quaint little 'stalls only' theatre that ran 'second-run' films. I learned how to clean the projection room, which was no easy chore, polishing floors and brass, dusting everywhere. It was like being in the army. I worked twelve hours a day five days a week. The lavatory had an opening at the bottom of the door and my initiation ceremony was to be locked in and be exposed for a short time to the smoking burning fumes of nitrate film wrapped in burning newspaper! As it turned out, the Century was an ideal training ground and amongst the interesting experiences was to see a fellow projectionist partially mangle his finger in the intermittent sprocket, during the screening of the Norman Wisdom Comedy "A Stitch In Time", in an attempt to avoid stopping the film when the film ripped on the projector. The only time I saw this film in colour was when the film was being repaired on the rewind bench stained with his blood! During my time at the Century Cinema I had an offer to work at the Odeon in Southend, but felt I wasn't ready. In September 1964 I finally accepted and, looking back, spent the two happiest years of my working life there.
But what makes the draft at least bearable for me are the blunders. Year after year somebody messes up, and you have to turn on your twitter windshield wipers to clear through all the jokes and laughs people have about it. Last year it was the Vikings and Titans taking their quarterbacks WAY too early. A few years ago it was the Raiders going with SirDropsALot Darius Hayward-Bey (see, JOKES). And then there’s my favorite, Eli Manning nearly in tears as he was drafted first overall by the Chargers. “MOMMA I’M NOT GOING TO PLAY THERE. THEY CAN’T MAKE ME NO NO NO NO.”
It may not be a perfect fit pattern, but the frequencies are used and the shape of the statement and the pattern in the excel chart is a best fit.
And since the judging ended I read, reviewed and drooled over Gillian Philip's Firebrand, which is my Book of the Year in this category. Published by a smallish independent, Strident (who also published Linda Strachan's Dead Boy Talking and her earlier Spider, which just won the Catalyst award) Firebrand has already re-printed and is moving off the bookshop shelves faster than you can say "paranormal romance."
I really must go on some national news syndicate and start explaining to men in their thirties that these types of pictures are unacceptable and will never land them a decent girl-next-door type.
I haven’t gone crazy with food, and I have worked out consistently, but there’s not enough Zumba in the world to convince me I lost weight this week…
I’ve seen him a few times since, but the romance never left the ground, on account of our overly common ground.
Gone are the days when I can justify sitting on the couch blogging at least once a week while the two wee ones peacefully nap the afternoon away. The big 4-year-old in the house has officially kicked the nap habit, and so far he hasn't fully caught onto the "rest in your room until the first number on your clock is a 3" concept. Sigh.
AND if you share my giveaway ANYWHERE
In order to achieve the goals of phase two the environmental club should be autonomous with teacher support and an outdoor classroom must be constructed before September.
Good morning! I have a quick post to share today... got to get going and do stuff!
I have used my Spellbinders Die Grand labels Four for my Base of my Card. I Embossed my next layer with Snowflakes. I added Glitter so the Snowflakes will give the pop factor. I have used KAndrews Stamp sets. I stamped my owls multiple times on different papers then I cut and layered them to give dimension.
As for my writing, I am attempting to address the labyrinth of panties, knickers, thongs, briefs, g-strings, boyshorts, hipsters and bikinis that are available to us. These different types also come in a variety of cuts at the leg, different materials (including edible), with or without gusset and you can even buy some without a crotch! No wonder it is hard to know what is the best for us, as long as they stay up when we want them to!! Wish me luck as I attempt to unravel this mystery. Lx
..... does not smell as sweet. Shakespeare was wrong.
The international development minister, Gareth Thomas, today told a business conference that trade routes across central and southern Africa could be "revolutionised" by the UK's north-south corridor initiative to rebuild the transport infrastructure in six former British colonies – Zambia, Zimbabwe, Botswana, Malawi, Tanzania and South Africa – as well as two other countries with close trading ties to them, Mozambique and the Democratic Republic of the Congo.
Jim Dickinson - piano
Basically, I have nothing good to say, and therefore never say anything. But I figured everyone who reads this is hating me for not posting anything and making their lives more difficult without reward, so I thought a post was in order. I've been keeping a journal, which is probably a contributing factor in the lack of blog posts. Everything I'd say here, I already said there.
"Write about someone who made your childhood bearable."
It does however suggest a very simple solution to the pension crisis. Let pensioners award themselves a 50 percent increase - because we're worth it!
Daniel defeats Big Show, by making him tap to the Yes Lock…sort of. John Laurinaitis shows up, out of nowhere and calls for the bell. He comes into the ring, and tells Big Show that he heard he made fun of him Monday night on Raw. This coming Monday, he will apologize formally, and he leaves the ring. He informs us that at Extreme Rules, Brock Lesnar destroyed John Cena, and at Over the Limit, he will shock the world by defeating Cena, and it’s all for “People Power”.
Stellenbosch, South Africa
reform, but it will not be achieved by installing a police state where
I stood up. The legs of my chair screeched across the floor. I couldn’t say anything. I didn’t know if he was screwing me around or if he was just plain crazy.
I prayed to greet you once more in this life,
The prayer that Jesus Christ taught here is a simple prayer but a powerful prayer. As you lay on your bed or stay in your room or offices, you can simply speak out this prayer believing that God is going to release ‘Joy and peace’, Joy in the Holy Spirit (which is the Spirit of Jesus Christ) into your heart. Joy and Peace in the Lord are like brothers, that usually comes together.
It'll be all:
Work hands on with producers creating a variety of graphics for use on-air, online, at events and more.
As the years passed, I made it a point to wear my contacts as much as possible.
This IS a "what if", after all. Not a documentary. I would never dream of spoiling the end of this one, only to say I was greatly disappointed at the turn of events. The Final Countdown could have gone in several directions and should have. It wasn't until years later that the Back To The Future films showed how to have fun with paradoxes and alternate time lines and go back and forth between different realities. Here, we have one reality. And even when it is examined, we don't learn anything appreciatively different than anything else we have ever seen before this. Hell, this isn't even an improvement on The Yesterday Machine, and that's painful to say.
So Far it is rather good im not far into it but i will get through it between classes :) Im so happy about it looks so nice!
The family, of course, denies such allegations, with both Mahmoud Karzai and Qayum Karzai, for example, claiming their clan is above reproach. Even "Abdul Wali Karzai, the Stony Brook professor, said that his family had been unfairly attacked, but that the second-guessing of everything the Karzais did in Afghanistan explained his refusal to join his brothers," Risen says.
older & older & less appetizing
My skin type is fairly normal with an oily t zone with large pores especially on my nose area oh and a tendancy to breakouts (Lucky me)
Let us first calculate the current consumption of a 3 Ohms load running in 18 volts.
Then there's The Magic Flute. While it's an opera I've never done, the only roles for my voice type are ensemble roles, so it seemed like a low risk to agree to cover those two roles (Second and Third Lady), especially when the chance that I would go onstage in one of them was miniscule and the conductor welcomed my children at rehearsal. But as it happened, I took him at his word. I brought my children to rehearsal. While the conductor continued to be supportive, saying it was "a delight" to see them there (the fact is that, out of the entire cast and production staff, he was the only other parent; such is opera), the stage director and his staff begged to differ. It seems that Maestro had asked the stage director not to curse in front of the wee ones, and the stage director made it clear that that was "how he worked," and that children were not an appropriate ancillary to his method (in all honesty, Maestro needn't have been sensitive on my behalf; I curse like a truck-driver, though I try to remove myself to another room when I feel like I have to, or else do so in Italian, though I know neither of those tactics are exactly praiseworthy). This has meant that, because of the sudden and unexpected need for child care, I've been to attend only a few rehearsals, and that, as a result, I wouldn't be able to execute the staging in any kind of admirable fashion if I happened to get a last-minute call that one of the mainstage singers was sick. I've done covers before, but this is the first time in my life that I haven't been prepared for the eventuality of going onstage, and it's a very uncomfortable feeling, not just because of that eventuality, but also because it's in violation of my own strict work ethic. I am grateful to the conductor for making accommodations on my behalf, but the truth is that few other people would have done so.
The long passed Charlemagne would never have allowed a claim of Royal title ahead of a Throneless heart of the EU European Empire and probably led to this inspired backlash. Doubtless the greatest among that era would not tolerate a smaller area led by one of his distant scions to ATTACK Germany (how could they?). Claim sovereignty over what that one still considers sovereign territory via the EU.
Best part of the day, though?
There are no lot codes or any other identifier on the product. The sprouts were distributed only in Ohio. The Ohio Department of Agriculture discovered the contamination under the USDA’s Microbiological Data Program, which is set to be eliminated by the White House and Congress in FY 2013.
It dropped. The sun – by this time up – flashed on the burnished blade as it described an arc in falling. Simultaneously the sound of the volley rang out. Flame and a tiny puff of greyish smoke issued from the muzzle of each rifle. Automatically the men dropped their arms.
But since the CSM moved to a larger property in Greenwich, New York, in 2003, little has been done to the 1876 Abbey and 1896 Chapel buildings. The interiors of each are, for the most part, gutted; work was begun on the buildings, but never completed, due to the subprime mortgage collapse. Some significant interior architectural features have been left intact, but the majority of the structures have been stripped down to their frames. The properties are owned by Ginsburg Development, and their website indicates that they will be developed as "The Abbey at Fort Hill", a 12-unit luxury condo complex. This would be to the benefit of the town of Peekskill, which sorely needs the tax revenue, but also to the benefit of the Community of St. Mary - as part of the proposed development, Ginsburg would relocate the cemetery to the Greenwich location, bringing the founding Sisters to the modern convent.
Put the cooked chicken on a clean platter or large serving dish. Spoon the cooked veggies all around the chicken.
The Joyce Theater Foundation presents the American premiere of the Sadler’s Wells London/Sylvie Guillem Production 6000 miles away. Guillem makes a rare American visit for the U.S. premiere of this evening of works by three of today’s most important choreographers: William Forsythe, Mats Ek and Jiri Kylian. Wed 7pm, Thur & Sat 8pm. $35-$110.
She sent me the most precious treasures ~
Size: 73 Mb
#2 Post this giveaway on Facebook.
I love this travel case being offered…
The teaser contains approximately 20 second clips from each of the six songs on the album. “Ein” will be released on June 1st, 2012, on Pug-Nose Records.
I wanted hooks to hang things like keys, Kodi's leash, my purse, an umbrella, etc., so we bought hooks at Lowe's this past weekend and attached them on the bottom. First we pre-drilled the holes for the screws, so that we didn't split the wood.
17. “He will perform the will of them that fear Him” (ver. 19). He will perform it, He will perform it: though He perform it not at once, yet He will perform it. Certainly if therefore thou fearest God, that thou mayest do His will, behold even He in a manner ministereth to thee; He doeth thy will. “And He shall hear their prayer, and save them.” Thou seem that for this purpose the Physician hears, that He may save. When? Hear the Apostle telling thee. “For we are saved in hope: but hope which is seen is not hope: but if what we see not we hope for, then do we with patience wait for it: “the salvation,” that is, which Peter calleth “ready to be revealed in the last time.”
MoVem-Beer is simple. Based on the very popular and successful fundraising exercise, Movember, which raises money through the sponsorship of blokes growing a moustache during November, our version involves simply drinking beer. Much easier. But not just any beer, no – you need to work a bit here.
Did anyone else see this sing at Target? Did anyone else really have to resist buying it to hang in your room? I seriously had it in my basket for my whole Target trip! Then I realized....it might not be such a good idea to put this up! Soooo reluctantly I put it back! It does make me smile to look at it though! The past few days have been rough for me. I found out the only teacher on my team I actually get a long with...is leaving. I am beyond happy for her, I knew how miserable she was at school (this was the subject of most of our discussions because we had the same feelings)! I am happy she will be able to stay at home with here precious little babies and finally enjoy what she is doing! However...I hope out of this comes something great. I hope we get a younger teacher, who will conveniently be teaching next to me. One who will actually want to collaborate, and try new ideas! So enough of that and I will stay true to the sign.....NO WHINING!!! I will put on my big girl panties and deal with whatever is about to come my way!
~Matt 11:28(NIV)
This has been a hard few months watching the world get so battered by Mother Nature. First the horrific floods in my home state of Queensland and then the devastating Christchurch earthquake in my adopted country of New Zealand (the second in six months) and now the earthquake and tsunami that has hit Japan. And it's so hard to know what to do. I think we all donate as much money as we can afford and of course send our prayers and best wishes to everyone, but most of all I think we all just turn and see what we've got and count our blessings.
Obviously I have a thing for numbers but these numbers I’ve listed are all about me. And veganism is NOT about me; it’s about the animals. It seems strange but sometimes in this fight, in this mission that is FOR the animals and THEIR lives, our own lives, my life can take center stage. The waters of altruism can get muddled with ego, pride, personal interests, judgment, anger, frustration and all sorts of human foibles.
so strong
However, those cost money to make. I suspect the genius behind this epic fail of a sales pitch took a look at his resources--pics of a sex doll posed against various backgrounds--and a little light went off. "Hey, I can have something like those animated things and it won't cost nearly as much!"
You may not be able to say the words "I love you" but actions really do speak louder than words.
And, you know — you know, that subject has come up and sometimes in fun but sometimes not in fun. But, you know, there are laws against age discrimination, so if you push this too much, you better be careful.
Calculator
For more information please visit the website.
now tarnished, perfection fully vacant.
Gregory: you don’t want to talk
Have a great Monday.
011-45392235
It has just won 4 oscars... including best movie of the year (big one), best actor, best director.
AND, AND AND AND, if I win, I'll never write a post about 40K. Everyone bar Loquacious on the ol' HoP does that, as do most of the blogs on the roll, and it's getting boring. I won't cheat and do Warmahordes either. Vote for me, and be guaranteed a shot of something different every week - might be WFB, a historical, a Specialist Game, an RPG, a board game, a book review, something that isn't 40K. A vote for Von is a vote for diversity - and that's not something this straight white able-bodied British bloke ever thought he'd be able to say with a straight face.
Caribbean.
DWM has an exclusive look at the forthcoming Christmas Special, featuring brand new photos and tasty tidbits from the cast and crew!
I don’t know why but some people like reading the random posts found at Happinessstanliveshere. Well I do know but I pretend not to because that might jinx it.
In contrast there are photographers who photograph intimately but in a different context. Diane Arbus sought out freaks, individuals who were on the edge of society, those that weren’t the norm, people with disabilities or defects. Her subjects were not people whom she knew before photographing although it is said that she later formed friendships with some.
Tonight at midnight myself and my blessed friends and family will go back into the battle. We shall not be defeated for we fight in the Army of the Lord. Jesus has won the victory. He is risen. And the gates of Hell shall not prevail.
You get the Boy dressed. You get yourself dressed. You get out the house.
2 – Light
The difficulty I am finding is the time away from family. I understand we have committed to this by coming away as a four to have absolute focus on our job of making this boat as fast as we can, yet its still hard at times when on the phone to my wife and kids back home.
You broke my heart when you broke my trust,
I should mention that the packaging on the Brett bottles is very nice. Each bottle's label appears as a certificate with a unique number, mine was 3492 of the 11,950 bottles produced. The Saison-Brett on the bottle appears handwritten (and I know whose handwriting it is). It's really quite a striking bottle. On the back label is a batch number, this batch is 2008-1. When I went over to Boulevard to make this season's batch of Nutcracker (that's right, I'm taking credit for the whole batch now) we discussed doing taste tests comparing batches. If you were able to buy several bottles you should set aside one or two and compare them to another batch further on down the line. It also may be interesting to find out how the Brett (Brettanomyces is a wild yeast strain that is a bit unpredictable and is used to bottle ferment this beer and gives the beer it's name) ages. It would take someone with willpower greater than mine to let one of these sit around for a year, but I'm definitely going to try.
Thanks for stopping by and have a wonderful week!
Who has Instagram? Do you love it, too? Tell me about it. And kindly follow me: kathrinetan. Hahaha :)
If you do all these things there is still no guarantee that you will be published, no one has the right to expect a publisher to put out money to publish and promote a book unless they believe it will sell enough to make more than it cost them - that is only common sense!
Instilled with a superiority complex, I was of the mindset that anything said in another language could be translated, with its full value intact, to English; being one of the “largest and more complex” languages of the world, how could it not accurately convey the meaning of the rather “primitive counterparts”? However, upon coming to the Netherlands, my outlook as changed substantially. Not only is the word’s largest dictionary the “Woordenboek der Nederlandsche Taal” (Dictionary of the Dutch Language), there are words in the Dutch language that [as far as I know] English lacks – descriptions of a complex situational/emotional/societal state by a sole descriptor. You could argue that these words can be effectively translated, however in my attempts I’ve found that nearly all the depth is lost in translation – the English words sound banal in comparison.
-2 servings of fresh spinach
In “On Letting Go”–now Part I–I wrote a little about trying to figure out the moment when it was time to let go of my creation and send it out into the world. Part of the obstacle to ever truly embracing that moment is, I think, the fear about how this novel, which I have put so much of myself into, will do out there in the big, wide, and often harsh world. I want, so much, for the people who read my book to love it and my characters and my story like I do. Consequently, I am really afraid that some won’t. That fear is getting a little stronger as the release date approaches.
The New York Times: Un-Sane Since 1965.
That's when you have a choice of options :
“Is that a bird outside on the lawn?!”
but we knew it was just a broken heart.
This is a terrific wine that feels as though it has been made purely in the vineyard and not the winery, it is balanced and not forced or overworked at all and is more mineral and the oak is in a more supporting role than is normal in Spain – 91/100 points.
The upmarket grocery retailer has matched prices on 1,000 branded lines since September 2010 and is now expanding the offer to 7,000 products.
Rainbow wakes of flame.
“Tell Me About Yourself.”
Dear Republican Party:
a deer, my ears turned toward every whisper,
Have a happy lie-free New year!
Even coming into the rain in Paris, I felt something like a sense of relief. It felt like “home”. Things seemed normal to me. When I was in SE Asia, I didn’t realize how much I felt out of synch with things. Don’t get me wrong – I had a wonderful time there. But I’m just as pleased to be back into the western hemisphere!
Similar problem can be tackled by Total Knee replacement surgery also especially when all three compartment of knee cartilage are damaged. In this we shave of ends of femur and tibia and replace by an artificial metal joint, which has certain life.
We recently asked the question to a motivated focus group here at CultFit HQ: Define the Tabata Method in under 10 words? The usual suspects emerged…CrossFit, Intervals, Intensity, Pinterest, Yoga (we called BS on this one), Blah Blah.
“It’s going to be a lot more money,” he said.
I Scream Sandwiches
The main application of cable ties is in holding and binding the different types cables utilised in electrical equipments and their appliances all over the world. It’s always important to maintain the wires systematically and efficiently so that they are not a messy, which will result in simplicity in use and identification.
I know how much we all love rules. ;)
I'm taking my daughter to see The Lorex By Dr. Suess Friday after school! It comes out Friday, March 2nd! After the movie, we're going to IHOP to have some Lorax breakfast!
Dining room we're fine.
Getting into this country is incredibly protracted. It took hours and hours for us all to get clearance from the ship to disembark. They did it deck by deck. You had to queue to get your green card stamped and show passport and esta form and so we didn’t have very long in this place. The authorities came on board and checked everything and’ looking in cupboards and all over the ship, thought they were looking for stowaways.
the sum total of
I stopped by the dollar store on my way home and they were out of OPKs. So instead of driving out of my way to try another store I decided to take it as a sign.
“The fact that we exist gives kids something to aspire to.”
Exodus 21:15 “Anyone who attacks his father or his mother must be put to death.“
Name the number one person who would make you faint if he/she commented on your blog or tweeted you on Twitter. (Can be a celebrity, author, or anyone else, but it has to be a real, living person.)
17 Can you be moved from job to job if the universities’ priorities change?
Publisher: Candlewick
But this time, with the similiar inspiration from Delicious, I decided to do a marmalade bread pudding. This time with some gorgeous homemade marmalade, minus the croissant top and with some added dried fruits.
I haven't written anything in a while. I realize it's because I always want what I write to be eloquent or impacting. Frankly, that is an exhausting thought, and even more so an activity.
Buchanan says that this passage is anachronistic in the context of Sandel’s book. Sandel retreats to a modest position here: he is merely offering further considerations that must be taken into account in the enhancement debate; he is not, despite all appearances to the contrary, offering a complete dismissal of enhancement. Having not read Sandel’s book, I’ll have to take Buchanan’s word for it.
The result is five things that are both my staples and current loves. I hope they make you smile too.
Kenanga Research also noted that since Sime Darby was expected to equity account E&O’s earnings on an associate level, that would only translate to a meagre 0.6% increase to Sime Darby’s profits in 2012 and 2013.
That you get to know,
As the mother of two children diagnosed on the autistic spectrum, I have been given the privilege of choosing to view the world through a completely different lens. And it is a choice. Many people make the choice not to look through this lens and continue to blame bad parenting or wrong life choices for what they see. But for me; this lens helps me to see and appreciate the small things that I may have never have noticed before, and it makes a lot of things clearer and has caused my focus to change dramatically.
So thank you so much Sally, it is sitting on my desk at the moment, making me smile as I'm studying :)
As a lawyer, she earned enough to free me from worries about the future of our children.
My walk so far:
694. Bison Hunter’s Bologna & Fat Cat and a Mixed Green Salad w/ Asiago & Black Peppercorn Popcorn Seasoning @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 12:32 p.m.
“Will you relate the story of your adventure just as it happened?”
Sky meets earth
quarters,' he said. 'But you'll get there; I'll see to that.'
I am the sort who loves both giving and receiving surprises….however small they may be. So had been preparing for the day excitedly…almost feverishly, for the entire month.
Preheat oven to 350°F. Spray a 9-inch square baking pan with nonstick cooking spray with flour. Line the pan with parchment or aluminum foil, leaving an overhang on opposite sides to lift the cake out after baking. Spray the parchment or foil with nonstick cooking spray with flour.
Over the past 50 years Africa's lion populations have plummeted from over 200,000 in the 1960's to fewer than 25,000 today. A shocking number if you consider the size of the continent. There have been many conservation foundations working to improve the lot of the African lion, but sadly to date the declines have not abated. In fact the rate of decline in lion numbers is accelerating. Ghana, Coted’Ivoire, and Congo are the latest African countries added to the list that have lost all their lions, and Nigeria, Kenya and Uganda predict local extinctions in the next ten years. Source: lionaid.org
Maybe then we close the curtain
Beastly is a so so romantic-fantasy movie. I want to like it. Badly. Trust me. I just can’t.
In truth neither from the Samnites, nor from the Carthaginians, nor from both Spains, nor from all the nations of Gaul, have we received more frequent checks and alarms; nor even from the Parthians: for, more vigorous and invincible is the liberty of the Germans than the monarchy of the Arsacides.
15-20 pandan leaves, at least a foot long each and at least 1 – 2 fingers girth wide
'Our Father!' If He heard us, He would surely
Anyway, all this reminds me of my favorite Victorian-era sentimental ballad: “A Bird in a Gilded Cage.” Like virtually all 19th/early-20th century tear-jerkers, it features a beautiful woman dying of despair because she gets trapped in a bad relationship (in this case, she’s a gold digger who marries an old guy for his money).
Made in 2011. Directed by Jaume Collet-Serra
“Good morning, little man!” said his mother in a cheerful voice.
Douglas E. Richards has written extensively for National Geographic KIDS and American Fencing magazines. His Prometheus Project series has been called “perfect for middle grades,” by Teaching K-8 magazine, is listed as “recommended literature” by the California Department of Education, and has been praised by Asimov’s Science Fiction magazine, School Library Journal, Kirkus, and many others. Because the books contain accurate, mind-expanding science, they have been endorsed by the AAAS, the Science Teachers Association of New York State, and similar associations in eight other states. In recognition of his work, Richards was selected to join Ray Bradbury, Stan Lee, and Rick Riordan at Comic-Con in San Diego this year, where he presented on how to write can’t-put-down thrillers with universal appeal.
Surprise is often expressed that the collection contains, at a conservative estimate, 150,000 photographic images. Besides the ever growing parish collections, the National Church has made use of photographic images as part of its outreach programme since the 1880s. Evidence of lantern slide and later photograph and film production is dotted throughout the manuscript collections.
This dude totally freaks me out. Zuma was a Filipino movie I watched when I was maybe 7 or 8 years old, and I still remember him after all these years. Well, I mostly remember cowering in fear. He's supposed to be some sort of Aztec demigod who got unearthed from a buried Aztec pyramid. He's big, he's green, he's strong, and he wears a freaking two-headed snake around his shoulders! Man, he gave me nightmares for a long time.
“But the more the violence and fear increases, the more people are coming to the Lord, the more cartel members are coming to church, and the more drug addicts are getting saved. Satan is using young people, but God is fighting back. In Monterrey, we’re seeing a great move of God among the youth. They want more of God, they’re hungry for Him. I’ve never seen a greater opportunity to reach the lost and advance the kingdom.”
Ink: Memento tuxedo black, rich cocoa (Tsukineko), pear pizzazz, so saffron (SU), Distress Ink brushed corduroy (Ranger), Copic markers
Drive all day, party just enough.
Battling Alzheimer’s:
International Business Times
After the movie, Jewell and I headed over to Quincy’s (it’s a bar inside the hotel) for An Evening with Roddy Piper which was billed as a stand up act, but was really more like a stream-of-consciousness recitation of his early years in wrestling. Think of An Evening with Kevin Smith, but less scripted and well-rehearsed. You can’t fit all that on a poster so stand up act it is. I’m not a fan of wrestling, but when I was a kid, I did watch the show every once in a while. Plus, They Live is one of my favourite John Carpenter flicks.
Some people, however, refuse to surrender. Consider these two cases...
Second, and perhaps more significant, the London company has introduced the H-type stem which increases the handlebar height to a shade over 107cm, making much more sense for this six-foot-sixer.
Ranger: Picket Fence Distress Stain; Jet Black Archival Ink; Glue N' Seal; Rock Candy Distress Stickles; Cloudy Blue, Silver, Black, Snow Cap Paint Dabbers; Walnut Distress Ink
I wish I could recall offhand an example of the rare but not unheard-of occurrence of a felicitous typo, which produces a merry verbal gaffe. Something like an elephant that held a midget in his trunk, or the famous student boner, ‘The Templar asked Rebecca to become his mistress. The brave girl reclined to do so.”
Brother Alembrihan just prayed. He said he prayed normally. Though he speaks in tongues, he said that he did not pray on tongues on that occasion. He prayed just like he always does for people. He did pray for an extended period of time, about 30 minutes. It was the first time he had prayed for a dead person to come to life. Suddenly she opened her eyes. She was alive. As her eyes opened the demon came out violently and screaming. Her whole body thrashed about and horrible sounds were made from her mouth. After the demon was gone, she spoke and said that she was hungry, so immediately they gave her food to eat.
Even though I really liked Kirk, it was Lyndarum’s character that I really came to love. I loved his utter sweetness and determination to survive in a world that is prejudiced against him because of his looks and because he’s a shifter. Shifter’s are hunted down and immediately killed, so he must hide his true identity from others so he can survive. This is also difficult for him because Lyndarum is considered flawed and worthless because of the freckles that cover his face and body. This was a great shame because Lyndarum was truly as beautiful on the outside as he was on the inside, and it’s because of this beauty, it makes Kirk want to be a better man so he can deserve Lyndarum’s love.
It is a trilogy, and I went ahead and bought the bundled set yesterday because my friend was raving about it. I had not heard anything about this book prior to the book club selection and I didn’t read any reviews about it, so I didn’t really know the premise, but she warned me that it was “pretty steamy.”
Now I will be on the hunt for the antique brooches, pendants or rings, although I understand they are rare and very expensive.
Funnily enough, just the other day I was talking to a neighbour, Monsieur Bosquet, who pointed out that this is an exceptional year for the Morel mushroom and inquired as to whether I had seen any?
Anyway, porn ain’t new to Star Trek. The two have crossed their matter streams more than once over the years, to varying degrees of effect and success. Before that? The fanzine crowd was racing at warp speed into the world of “slash fanfic.” You want to pair up a couple of characters from your favorite show? Put a slash between their names, crib some scenes from an old issue of Penthouse Letters, and we’re off. Roll the dice, hook up anybody and everybody, regardless of gender or species, and let’s see what happens.
they beg Cinderella’s forgiveness, which she grants, and are subsequently married to two Lords of the
Fact is More Horrible than Drama
The other way to do this is to add the cheese to the toasted slices, chuck them back under the grill till the cheese melts (about 2 mins) and then top the soup with the cheesy slices.
Bringing ingredients together...
“Didn’t they show it to you?” Yossarian demanded, stamping about in anger and distress. “Didn’t you even make them read it?”
Mary got better.
Pitter patter pitter patter pitter patter....and this time it's not the feet of little ones ....It's the rain on the window!!! When will it ever stop? I knew the garden was crying out for the rain but even that is now needing a rest.....I have a feeling the seeds we planted will be coming up further down stream. :-)
An Irishman, Dillon, said: "I can produce and endless succession of confirmations that the conditions in most of the camps are appalling and brutal. To my opinion the fatality rate is nothing less than cold-blooded murder."
I think we've all looked at the fluffy white clouds in the sky as kids (maybe even now) to see animal shapes or faces forming and floating apart.
She claims that the preview for the recent Ryan Gosling vehicle “Drive” (no pun intended) looked to be akin to any one of the “Fast and the Furious” movies, a franchise Deming apparently really, really likes.
He reminded the Chinese that the Penang feat would not be possible in other states at the moment due to the demography of voters in the country.
Ink: Melon Mambo, Basic Black, Real Red, Daffodil Delight, Lucky Limeade, Calypso Coral, Rich Razzleberry, Early Espresso, Rose Red, Garden Green, Crumb Cake
11 Edmonton Events Center, Edmonton, AB CANADA
Anyway, today started out extremely shit-box. First I called my father and asked him bizarre questions, he responded by telling me about my life with my “significant other” and all I could think is he going to start about “spending quality time and trips to Hawaii?” People with my skin-tone don’t do well in Hawaii. He was understanding, when I said, “I don’t want to talk anymore” He said “O.K. Call back when you feel better” Which was nice.
yo = yarn over (grab yarn) lp = loop sp = space st = stitch
In all seriousness folks, I am not trying to sell you mustard. I am simply giving you something to try. Everyone gets over a breakup differently, but the foundational strategies remain the same: keep busy, focus on yourself and do things that will make you happy. How you choose to interpret those things is up to you; I simply chose to put a little mustard in my life.
Closing Song
Anyway, she was a little teary-eyed in the morning when we dropped her off, but did fine for the rest of the day (and the three days that followed).
So let’s set the human race on the path to copying good deeds and good news stories.
Will you make it again: yes more often
I have a whole new flock of kindergarteners! They are all adorable and tiny and year after year I forget how little they know. I'm not talking about the academic stuff, but the everyday, navigating through the school day stuff.
2. Cream together the butter and sugar until pale and fluffy.
The Sharpville Massacre
As they came to sleep gently in the space between my belly and my diaphragm........
The writer uses the word ‘deep’ to describe the extent of his great capacity and desire for God. Yet, he acknowledges God as ‘Deep’ in His ability and resources—which are compared to noisy waterspouts, waves, and billows. The writer knows God is capable of covering him with great and overwhelming springs of living water. He doesn’t use ‘still water’ as an analogy in this case—which also can run deep—as a symbol of God’s ability to sustain him. He uses a wild and lively outpouring of water that is continually overflowing and unstoppable.
Your lips abuzz
In this issue of Daredevil we get the conclusion to the 3 part Omega Effect storyline that crossed over with Avenging Spider-Man and The Punisher. At the end of issue 6 we saw Daredevil steal an artifact called the Omega Drive from several high profile terrorist organizations and they’ve been chasing him down ever since. Now he’s taking the fight to them with the help of Spider-Man and The Punisher. This mini crossover plays off like an old school team-up in the best way possible and Mark Waid has really found a way to redeem the title after the debacle from the end of Shadowland. He’s made Daredevil fun again without taking away all of the darkness that’s helped make the character such a success over the last decade.
– saw “Cabin In The Woods”. LOVED “Cabin In The Woods”. Considering it was written/directed by Joss Whedon I already knew going in that I would like it, but my face still lights up thinking about certain scenes. Seriously people, the elevators at the end. The elevators.
And if you like, you can use them too.
One fell out of the frame. And it’s cute, so I want it back. It should take one minute. And yet I need to put it on a list to make it happen.
“So at least now I can have enough time to write a happy record. And be in love and be happy. And then I don’t know what I’ll do. Get married. Have some kids. Plant a nice vegetable patch.”
7
- Connect to console via lag free USB
When did people stop caring about social conventions? About the rules of the road? Is parking no longer taught in schools? The worst I saw today was a car parked SIDEWAYS on the parking lot, taking up three spots. I was uber amused to see that two cars had parked, one at the nose and one at the tail, blocking it in tighter then tight, but still, WTF? It wasn't even a nice car!
be no perfect man…,and much later a
He loves people but he's a little more introverted.
So the idea that “travel” and “travail” are linked by their shared connotation of “work” actually makes a lot of sense. What is really intriguing is the connection to “trepalium”. Back in Roman times, this was a very specific device with a solitary purpose: to inflict agony. This is not like other metaphors for work, like “grindstone” or “treadmill”, which hint at pain or discomfort as a side effect of productivity. All the trepalium produced was pain and discomfort. Sometime back in the history of language, somebody used the word “trepalium” to suggest that work was a form of torture, and the suggestion was resonant enough to embed itself in our language. So the next time you feel like your office is really a gothic torture chamber in disguise, maybe you’re not being overdramatic — maybe you’re just being traditional.
Looking past the hoodie, do you see someone's child?
Myth 5: Eating at night makes you fat.
Earlier in his speech, Lim said the coming state election is a crucial crossroad for Sarawakians to choose between the BN’s politics of patronage, cronyism and corruption or Pakatan, a government centred on enabling the people with skills and education, empowering them with rights and opportunities and enriching the people by ensuring an equal share of the fruits of economic success.
#144 Evil Cat Arts
Another thing I had a problem with was that the module felt fairly railroady for a dungeon as there were a couple of areas where you either had no choice of which way to go or your choice really didn't make a difference. For instance, in the teleport trap mentioned above there really is no alternative to jumping into it. The way behind you has been closed off and there is no other way out. Railroaded.
2010.08.15 Iraq Numaniya 1 0 Muslim gunmen murder an Iraqi pharmacist who had returned from studies in the U.S.
Best known for the Critics’ Choice Movie Awards, now going into its 18th year, the Broadcast Film Critics Association established BTJA and the Critics’ Choice Television Awards in 2011 on behalf of television journalists working in electronic media to celebrate outstanding work in television. In addition to honoring the best shows and performers from the previous season, the Critics’ Choice Television Awards will also highlight the Most Exciting New Series premiering in the coming months, judging from pilots and early episodes.
In proposing to replace the word euthanasia with the term “aide médicale à mourir,” the committee is introducing a euphemism that both trivializes and is likely to conceal underlying moral and ethical issues.
We are jurying for both of these shows NOW!
of dissipation in Jupiter and Io . . . . As Cassen et. al. . . . point out, the satellites would
I have read that the gel grips are slightly different formulations and consistencies on some of the models. (Unlike Gummi Bears?) My creamy white grip is quite soft and squishy, flowing and moulding under normal finger pressure. I wouldn’t be surprised if the grip has some ‘memory’ and becomes permanently deformed after extended use, but I haven’t used it long enough to say for sure. I have also read on some other reviews that people have had problems with the grip tearing. It didn’t happen to me, but I take extra care with my review pencils because I want to try and keep them in ‘as new’ condition for my collection. I could see the Alpha Gel grip being very susceptible to damage if stored in a pencil case and rolling around with other pencils and items. That’s just plain ole askin’ for trouble. Anyway, it does seem likely to me that the Alpha Gel grip is not particularly robust or durable. I’d also suspect that the grip won’t stay that nice milky white colour for too long in real-world conditions.
The sealife is swimming into a new season. With summer (hopefully) right around the corner, the sea creatures are filling up the art room.
“Are you OK?” he asked, looking at me and frowning.
“Golf, like measles, should be caught young.”
She says her soft spot for him developed after he defended her honor behind bars by beating up another inmate who groped her.
cut off where I marked with the "X" (1 1/4 x 6 inches) Then fold on all score lines and make 4 cuts where indicated. You can use die cut for that area but it will be difficult when you decorate the box later so that was why I just cut it straight. Assemble the box.
Our four-year-old loves it there. We usually bring along a DVD in case he gets ants in his pants, but it is hardly ever needed. He has no problem occupying himself by banging nails into scrap wood with his hammer or asking his tata (Serbian for “father”) what he’s working on and how he can help. When I’m around to witness how they work together, there’s almost always at least one sappy mom moment where my eyes well up with tears.
So of course there’s also a special prize… A special Midwinter themed How To interview on my blog on December 21st. A chance to tell us about your story, your blog and everything it takes to write a great seasonal scene!
I have heard of fine soldiers who have thought that the king of France, when he was defeated and captured by the emperor before Pavia, had all of his bad fortune because he had the pope’s, or as they boastfully call them, the Church’s, people with him. For after they came to his camp with a great cry of Ecclesia, ecclesia! “Church, Church!” there was no more good fortune there. This is what the soldiers say, though perhaps they do not know the reason for it, viz., that is not right for the pope, who wants to be a Christian, and the highest and best Christian preacher at that, to lead a church army, or army of Christians. For the Church ought not strive or fight with the sword; it has other enemies than flesh and blood, their name is the wicked devils in the air; therefore it has other weapons and swords and other wars, so that it has enough to do, and cannot mix in the wars of the emperor or princes, for the Scriptures say that there shall be no good fortune where men are disobedient to God.
a light to the eyes
Welcome to our Party Decor Blog Hop. We have a fantastic group of ladies who love to make party decorations and we are excited to share our projects with you today! If you just happened to find my blog, thank-you so much. However, so you don't miss awesome projects or the chance to win blog candy, you will want to start at the beginning at http://mincedpaper.blogspot.com.
What a gorgeous hike! Glad for the company and beautiful day on the trail.
One of the keys to organizing my closet is editing. I am constantly reviewing what I have and donating or giving away what I’m not wearing or doesn’t fit. Even though post-baby, not everything fits yet (but almost:), and my “work” clothes are patiently waiting to see the light of day, I feel that displaying them in a nice way honors them and keeps them happy.
I drove to the antique mall the very next chance I got and the rug became MINE! Of course, I couldn't take it home with me because it's underneath a pile of crap, but I am okay with that. I waited this long, what's a couple more days?
Happy creating! :)
Last weekend, my youngest daughter and I walked to the local branch of the public library. It was a good bit of exercise, and we had some books that we needed to return. We decided to look around for a book to read, and both of us liked the look of a new one called Story of the Titanic by Steve Noon. With the centennial of the ship’s sinking, and the re-release of the film by James Cameron in 3-D, there’s certainly no lack of interest in this subject.
1. Elvis is dead.
SH: What if we have to ship something?
Murmuring groups going into quiet rooms: you see this all over Scotland in 2011. People (I am not thinking of the exemplary Ms McMillan) who used to be stridently pro-union suddenly became pro-nat when they saw the nationalist gravy trains heading into the stations.
I have to say that, as I crossed the street, I wanted to linger in between the yellow painted lines to look at the sunset superimposed upon all that neon. The reflections of pink and orange in the shining billboards and twinkling lights of McDonalds and car donation ads, well, it was actually kind of beautiful, like its own uptown tribute to dusk. My photos are at the end of this post.
Night before last I handed an apron to our granddaughter, pointed her towards the stove, armed her with utensils and a pan, and gave her her first official cooking lesson. This in answer to her request to be taught. It came as a bit of a surprise to me I must admit. Up until this week the only interest I had observed from her with regards to cooking was watching me from time to time in the kitchen, and an avid interest in consuming what appeared on her plate around dinner time. However, this was the first time she’d asked to participate in how the food actually came to arrive in such a place.
Terrelle, I can’t do that. Call somebody from the Christian right.”
The sweeping vistas of CGI that portray Asgard are suitably awesome, with retro-futurist castles and bastions balanced above seas contained by gravity fields in the midst of deep space, and the Bifrost is excellently depicted as a hyper-fluorescent stream of energy within a great glass catwalk. Branagh uses these environs to deliver a genuinely spectacular and well-visualised finale, when the boundaries of the acausal pocket about Asgard are broken and the protagonists literally hang on the edge of nothingness, the fragments of super-science and waters of myth each plunging into a cosmic maelstrom, and the peculiar nihilism of its villain taking on a sado-masochistic intensity in his twisted, incoherent ambitions. As As You Like It ably suggested, Branagh’s filmmaking is newly fluent and confident: the stunt-laden excessive camerawork and editing that marred his ‘90s work, as if he was so anxious to prove himself no theatre maven out of his element, are restrained as he emphasises character interaction. Yet there’s still a confident sense of movement and spectacle, blended with his vigour of rhythm
Bottomline of FFS - Out of pocket depends on services received, most expensive premium of the four main types of coverage, and complete freedom of choice.
Remember that scene in High Fidelity when Rob said he organized his record collection autobiographically? Mine is organized by season.
Then add cardamom powder and finally add thick coconut milk and grated coconut .Stir well and turn off the stove .
You might remember the picture of my Thai Noodle bowl from Monday. Well this is the Shrimp recipe we used to go on top of our noodles. We will be making this shrimp many more times. It was honestly the perfect combination of flavors and so easy to make. We sauteed our shrimp instead of grilling them- we prefer them that way, but I am sure they are delish grilled. I am hungry just thinking about this dish.
So, Last week I said we are not realizing our potential as an international team – and I stand by that. As a matter of fact after watching Brussels, I’m even more sure. It’s not a slam against our athletes. It’s actually a compliment because I think we have the best talent base in the world. It’s not a slam against our coaches either, because I think we have some of the best coaches in the world. So what’s the problem? The problem in my opinion lies in our organization – or lack thereof.
A couple of weeks ago, I drove to a party at a friends house, partied through the night, and got a ride home when the party was over; leaving my car at my friends house overnight. I got up the next day, and remembered that my car was not outside, and decided to ride my bike over to my friends house to pick up my bike. I get to my friends house, hang out for a while, and then leave my bike behind and drove the car home.
Per serving: Calories 257; Fat 4 g (Saturated 2 g); Cholesterol 8 mg; Sodium 580 mg; Carbohydrate 45 g; Fiber 10 g; Protein 12 g
Genre: Fiction - Paranormal
1/2 C coarsely chopped fresh cilantro, 1/2 C coarsely chopped fresh mint, 1/2 in piece fresh ginger (peeled and chopped), 3/4 C extra-virgin olive oil, 3/4 C rice vinegar, 1/2 tsp sugar, 1/2 tablespoon lime juice, salt and pepper. Puree in a blender until smooth, season with salt and pepper.
The car is also in the shop today getting all the belts and stuff changed out. It’s some small place in the middle of some industrial park.. Another yelp find. I forgot where we went in ‘boken. Probably that napa place, but I heard they are closing/closed. I’ll miss them but won’t miss that row of cars in the street and on the sidewalk.
Carrie Fundingsland – I’ve thought about it, but honestly enjoy finding the up-and-comers and giving them exposure. There are so many talented people out there. I really just use the online store as my own personal, little jewelry box. Everything on the site, are items that I love and would use in my own home.
I bought this bike for only 5 guineas 12s 6d !
Thou visitest the earth and waterest it, thou greatly enrichest it. — Psalm 65:9
So the author is one of those I call a 'PC vigilante', a self-appointed censor of other people. Self-righteousness on this issue, along with its companion vice, victimhood, is a plague on our society.
congrats! Can i take a chance for this supercady? I have put a link on my blog afcourse, how excited!
defeat any tax imposed by this title or the payment thereof shall,
11. Momma Weasel
So what is it Margo – ‘terminal illness’, ‘terminal condition’, ‘irrecoverable illness’ or ‘irreversible condition’?
million of the People’s money) and all the Satanist racketeering
On the one hand you claim Obama thinks himself omnipotent and omniscient, but when he goes to Europe to confer with our allies, saying we are neither omnipotent or omniscient and we need and will honor their views and information, you accuse him of “blaming America.” I think you have not thought through these issues, nor where America’s best interests lie — certainly not as well as has President Obama.
"The exception is more interesting than the norm. The norm proves nothing, the exception proves everything; it confirms not only the rule, rather the rule's existence is dependent upon the exception. Through the exception the power of real life breaks the crust of a mechanism stultified by repetition."
From 1987 to 2001 he helped build several TV stations in Florida, Los Angeles, North Carolina and Georgia. He finally retired in 2001, capping off over 55 years in Broadcasting.
So far I've sent out eight. I've got two partials out and I've gotten four rejections. I know that's not much yet, and I know I don't have any choice but to keep trying or give up. The trick now is to figure out how eldest does it. How she cries bitter tears (I reserve the right to eat chocolate instead) then shakes it off and keeps going, her spirit undiminished. It's probably mostly up to the fact that she's seven.
'Happy Christmas to everyone that is visiting SIBOL today!
Last post I mentioned the book Hipstermattic: One Man’s Quest to Become the Ultimate Hipster by Matt Granfield. I also linked to an article that contains an excerpt from the introduction of the book. In the excerpt, there is a certain part that stood out to me:
I handed the guy my resume and said "Can you give this to them?"
And what of these conquerors, these Narren? Are they people? Are they anything like people? They are the half-machine race–races–that we have been imaging for ourselves as part of the Rapture of the Nerds, as part of the Singularity. They might as well be gods, dinosaurs, thunder, forces of nature to us. Incomprehensible. Not benign, not malignant. Beyond all that. Agendas of their own much huger than the canvases on which we work. Stellar engineering, sucking the energy from suns, digging black holes. They are Robert Moses writ large.
Klipsch HD 300 Compact 5.1 HD Theatre System
her computer. She powered up, logged on, and sent three separate messages.
The DVD is available in Australia from the 4th of Sept. Check out your local variety stores for availability.
As I said earlier, the weather in the desert at this time of year is a crap shoot. This time we rolled the dice and crapped out. Our friends who have been going to Ocotillo Wells for years, said that this was their hottest trip ever.
Charm is deceptive, and beauty is fleeting; but a woman who fears the LORD is to be praised.
All of these are obviously distraction techniques to keep me from snacking, and not entirely practical. Maybe instead I should get some Sensa. I read about Sensa in the Parade Sunday paper insert, the same paper featuring those pictures of the Amish making heaters to sell at Sears. So, you know, it's a reputable source of information.
Shortly after arrival, Counie and Roommate went out for a smoke, so I moved tables to sit closer to Vinnie and the others. Chat chat chat, drink drink drink. Vinnie starts chatting up some girl. I guesstimate my chances at 0%. A noble starting point.
to be reached we must
(Yes, I know I totally cheated and linked up more than one post for couple of those topics. I'm indecisive. Sue me. ;) And now I'm going to cheat again by linking to my Best Of page and suggesting that you might find other interesting reads there or elsewhere in my archives. Ooo, I feel like such a meme-rebel.)
I'm beginning to find some narrative in my illustrations - stories waiting to be told. This drawing gives me clues to go forward – to look for stories and find ways to hint at them in pictures. The idea of "ah, therein lies a tale" intrigues me suddenly.
The windy conditions convinced me to put off my first run of the week until tomorrow.
As an Australian in Paris, I'm about as far removed from my sunburnt homeland as it is geographically possible to be. But that doesn't mean the heart-strings don't occasionally twang for the wide brown land. Bouts of nostalgia for Australia come in regular waves (more regular, in fact, the longer I live here in Paris) - and there's often nothing I like better than to take a break from all this European refinement and haute culture and lose myself in the raw, unwieldy, unchecked majesty of my sprawling country of birth.
Breakfasts: Bagels; Cereal; Cheese Toast and Scrambled Eggs; Oatmeal. All Served with fruit & milk.
I wonder at the Willy Pipp comparisons. Baseball is almost always a game about being still. Major league players all seek to find that magical line called statistical precedent and straddle it; I think if they were offered the opportunity to bat .700 for a single season or bat .350 for fifteen years they’d probably pick the latter. Perfect game, or twenty wins? Unassisted triple play in a call up game from Vasalia, or a career full of gold gloves? Aaron Corp is no Wally Pipp, because even one game can make a hero out of a college football player. Look at UCLA’s Patrick Cowan. Google his name and you’ll get to watch his gray matter ramify out his facial orifices as Rey Maualuga rearranges his cranium into something like a Mandelbrot set on acid, but UCLA fans will always remember him as the Guy Who Denied USC A Ticket To The Dance. Aaron Corp’s story so far is pure tragedy in a way Pipp’s never could’ve been. He was the starting quarterback at USC and he would’ve kept that job if he’d simply won. Gehrig was always going to be greater than Pipp, whether it was that day or some other day. Corp’s only chance was against Ohio State. We all knew it. It’s a shame he won’t get it, because even if Barkley flounders there’s no way the Golden One will ride the pine for the next two years. Pete Carroll is no gambler. He’s goofy and slightly retarded in that endearing vapid cheerleader kind of way, but he knows what’s up. Matt Barkley is his ticket to The Dance, which is incredibly odd to say because the starting quarterback for a championship team has been, very often over the last few years in both college and pro, the guy who doesn’t lose the game.
These are quite possible my favorite black and white and hands down my new favorite red!
Jumpy eyes/tics in eyes, which may cause dizziness/vertigo and headaches
1045 **D-IV/23/1989. “St. George and His Dragon: Sources and Consequences.” Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(4), above, pp. 744-58, and in Item C-1999(11), above.)
GLITTER: Stickles by Ranger in “Icicle”
We find ourselves perched in the plush surroundings of the Covent Garden Hotel in the capital's ubertrendy Monmouth Street, where test tube shaped bottles of water sit awkwardly on pristine, antique coffee tables. Pleasantries exchanged, not least a complimentary reminisce from our host about his previous encounter with Drowned In Sound, the interrogation begins.
We had a good but busy Thanksgiving. We traveled to my parents house as well as to my Hubby's parents house.
The webpage includes a Q&A bit that doesn’t always answer the question. For example:
Huckleberries
For Soni Sori and her family, the terrifying shadow of this war has deepened since the summer of 2009 when her 25-year-old nephew Lingaram turned down recruitment by the Maoists. Soon afterwards he was arrested, tortured, and pressurized to become a Special Police Officer. He was released after his family filed a Habeas Corpus petition and he then fled to Delhi. In July 2010, her husband was imprisoned as an alleged Maoist. In April 2011, 300 homes were razed to rubble in a three-day police operation. Lingaram, who had been speaking out about these atrocities and had by this time finished a short course in journalism, returned to Chhattisgarh to film and write about the lives of the people. Police harassment of the family intensified.
I leave you with this beautiful number Kiss the Rain.
Holly: She just kind of showed up there, and it made sense. I see them as a hot mix of sparring and attraction that eventually goes off a dangerous cliff. (Ooh. Could that be a novel? Maybe…we’ll see… ;) The movie premiere thing came later when I realized I could slip in that info about her secret. A lot of the events, btw, are/were real events—the zoo party, etc. I really did see the Black Eyed Peas guy at the Avatar re-release world premiere, and he really had a safety-pin man-purse.
“Jesus Christ is the only Son of God!”
A member of our extended family had a very scary medical episode that resulted in a hospitalization about eight hours from home. I really like the "strong" quote and feel it describes the way many members of the family stepped up and dealt with the situation: with strength and grace.
Arugula Rocket Salad 4.26.12
A combination of social, cultural, political and now environmental pressures with the underlying shame of what we have achieved, has deculturalised native people leaving them estranged from Englishness, severed from all the civilizing structures that their ancestors could take for granted. A serious and sustained programme of architectural reconstruction, rebuilding our traditional buildings and re-linking to our history could help people reconnect with their roots, and feel proud of their towns and cities.
Two new camp residents are men who are suffering from terminal cancer and sold their belongs to help pay for the medical care when their health-insurance stopped paying for their care. One man was a well-known Krugersdorp businessman who lived in the 'wealthier' part of town. With his illness he also fell into poverty. He's too ill to work and tries to survive on handouts. Once a month he gets chemo-treatment at a public hospital.There's also an Indian woman who was kicked out of her community because she became a Christian. And in one corner of the camp a group of black squatters was taken in 'for political reasons': after they moved in, the Krugersdorp municipality stopped harassing the Afrikaners.
No. Perhaps luckily, my own children are still too young. I don’t run ideas or early drafts past anyone, but when I’ve worked on them a lot more I do sometimes ask teenagers (or adults) to read them.
Ho’oponopono and Healing
But to be able to understand that our intelligence and mind are all part of the fundamentals of nature,
The address of the location is officially 810 West St. John's Street, Austin, TX. However, Google Maps will only show you 810 East St. John's. The reason is because there is no real 800 East block of St. Johns, instead it is a large space where the Midtown Commons is located. To put it in your Google Maps or Navigation system, use 1000 West St. John's Street, Austin, TX. It'll get you to the corner of St. John's and Lamar.
In this case, the BHA has decided to write to riders ‘expressing disappointment’:
He came on our porch, it was 5:30 in the morning
Advance it back, or forward shift?
He was not averse to taking formal portraits at sittings when the opportunity arose, such as this drawing room sitting of Ethel Barrymore taken at around the time she gave out what would become her most famous line, "That's all there is, there isn't any more."
We forgot the meaning of time and the sun began to rest its bright rays out of the sky. Finally we pedalled back to our campsite and were treated to shadows playing tricks on the landscape. We free wheeled back between the giant rocks which was thrilling… the shadows made the rocks feel as if they were giants chasing us from behind.
- me now, a year later
Thanks for hanging in there and like I said, stay put. It'll be worth it.
Floors were dirt. Only the wealthy had something other then dirt. Hence the saying 'dirt poor'. The wealthy had slate floors that would get slippery when wet so they spread thresh (straw) on the floor to keep their footing. As winter wore on, they added more thresh until, when you opened the door, it would all start slipping outside. A piece of wood was placed in the entrance way hence a threshold.
And this my friends is exactly the experimetation being conducted. Through conditioning, can the scorpion be coerced to change it’s nature. Can humankind through conditioning, be coerced to change it’s nature. Is mankind capable of avoiding conflict, hate, jealousy, murder, betrayal, greed, and war. This is Jacobs experiment. To see if mankind deserves a second chance.
Bieber says “I have had an incredible year and it is all due to the fans helping me live my dream. I’m turning 17 years old on Tuesday, and have so much to be grateful for!
I chopped myself into pieces: Higher Self vs. lower self, sex desire vs. spiritual desire, ego vs. soul, etc. etc…This very separation of self and Higher Self was also the backdrop of my prayer for oneness with God, and in my own fragmented consciousness, I relegated God to an impossible future: “If I try harder, if I’m chaste enough, if I’m good enough and strong enough…maybe then I will find oneness with God.” That inner schism between my “weak” and “faulty” self and with the God Ideal was tweaking me mentally to no end!
It's May...can you feel it in the air? The fresh scent of lilacs...the dewy grass...raindrops and robins
Similarly, Spain has worked hard to hold on to its energy companies — for example, thwarting a bid in 2006 by German energy group E.ON for Endesa. Yet a year later, because of less patriotic values in Britain, a Spanish company was easily able to buy our own Scottish Power.
I don't blame 'em.
It was while we were examining that specific scene, that we noticed a vehicle standing on the opposite side of the highway. On closer inspection we discovered that the sole occupant, sitting behind the steering wheel, had been shot dead in the head. The entrance wound resembled the typical .38 or 9mm calibre.
Ichigo, Uryu, Orihime, Chad, and Yoruichi (from now on, this group will be referred to the “Ryoka” because that is the term in-universe for people who enter soul society without being cleansed by a shinigami) make it through the portal between the regular world and Soul Society by the skin of their teeth. However, their first test in Soul Society comes the second they land in the slums of Soul Society where the newest souls live. When they try to enter the Seireitei (the inner circle of Soul Society where the shinigami live), a massive wall appears along with a giant named Jidanbo who challenges Ichigo to a duel. Ichigo easily dispatches the giant (he spent five straight days training with Uruhara after he learned the name of his zanpakuto and has gotten immensely stronger), but a far more serious threat immediately emerges. The shinigami captain who was taunting Byakuya Kuchiki last volume (about the execution of Rukia), Gin Ichimaru, appears and slices off the giant’s arm (who was letting Ichigo and his nakama as respect for defeating him). He is preparing to execute the defenseless giant when Ichigo steps in to protect the honor of a man he just defeated. However, despite his zanpakuto being about as big as a dagger, Ichimaru easily defeats Ichigo and the door to Soul Society shuts behind them.
We didn't catch any fish but the farmer's lovely wife brought us pizza. I think my daughter was not terribly bored. It was nice to have her with me. She is good a calculating how long it will take to finish the field.
That's exactly the same in real life when you meet someone new. Say it's a colleague. You see them daily. You know who they live with, if they have children, where they go on holiday, what their favourite food is ... But you might not know why they become defensive on a particular subject, or perhaps you notice they seem to over react to something trivial ...
Sovereign Lord, give us the grace and strength to endure trials and hardships when they come. Create in us a pure heart so we can be men and women after Your heart. In Jesus’ Name we pray, Amen!
When I hit someone you say "NO! That's wrong!"
oh them there are fightin words! where did they come from? Must be the 'mean' me talkin tonight cause the 'nice' me is over there on the couch watchin icarly on foxtel AGAIN aruugghhh so sick of watchin these kids programs! When will I get control of the remote????
Coincidentally, the problem started not long after a SmartMeter was installed toward the end of the remodel. Finally, after severe frustration, I phoned PG&E for help on this matter. A crew came out and looked at the AFCI breaker for a few seconds. One went to the truck and came back with a conventional meter, a mechanically driven version, and swapped it for the SmartMeter that was installed some days before. It took some prodding, but eventually one of the PG&E crew told me that they have been observing that AFCIs are sensitive to the meter’s radio transmissions.
Both Crooks and Colling have been in the news before. Crooks, for filming Inglewood police officers beating a 16-year-old boy in 2002. Colling, for killing a mentally ill 15-year-old who was waving a knife, in 2009. Colling shot him in the head.
What can I say? I love leaving lip-prints everywhere. :)
Gasoline
Dear Subconscious,
7. G’z & Hustla’z (prod DJ Premier)
Once upon a time it would be okay for someone to not realize that they had to get over. Maybe it was your first time driving that particular way and suddenly you find yourself in the right turn lane, but you don't want to go right. You look to the left to see if anyone is coming then try to safely make your way over. If not, you go ahead and turn right to go around the block and try it again.
3. Boys don’t get embarrassed easily.
Budget cuts: $385
I won't know total downloads through the Apple store before next quarter, so maybe mid- to late-January I'll have those figures.
Yes, the Christmas season brings warm (because I’m sweating after hoofing it from the far reaches of the parking lot) and fuzzy thoughts (due to extreme fatigue) of gift giving and candy canes and all the other wondrous things that go along with this, my favorite, holiday.
2 – Salmon Fishing in the Yemen – £1.085.687 – £3.186.574
In a nutshell, we did a LOT of sowing. Like sowing times a thousand. We walked the streets for two days dodging cars and running from dogs all the while trying to pray as we approached each house.
I commit myself to Stand One and Equal as these Words.
Makes about 1 liter (1 quart)
